


Robert Pittman (media executive) - Wikipedia






















 






Robert Pittman (media executive)

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Robert W. Pittman)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Bob Pittman



Pittman on July 20, 2011



Born
Robert Warren Pittman
(1953-12-28) December 28, 1953 (age 63)
Jackson, Mississippi, US


Occupation
Businessman


Known for
MTV
iHeartMedia


Spouse(s)
Veronique Choa Pittman


Children
3


Robert Warren "Bob" Pittman (born December 28, 1953), is an American businessman. Currently Chairman and CEO of iHeartMedia, Inc. (formerly Clear Channel), a global media and entertainment company, Pittman led the team that created MTV (eventually becoming its President).[1] Pittman joined Clear Channel in November 2010 as an investor and the company’s Chairman of Media and Entertainment Platforms, was named CEO of iHeartMedia (formerly known as Clear Channel Communications)[2] in 2011 and was named Chairman in 2013. Clear Channel became iHeartMedia, Inc. in September 2014. Pittman has also been the CEO of MTV Networks, AOL, Six Flags Theme Parks, Quantum Media, Century 21 Real Estate and Time Warner Enterprises, and COO of America Online, Inc. and AOL Time Warner.
Pittman has also been a radio and TV programmer, marketer, investor and media entrepreneur who has had multiple careers in a number of consumer-focused industries. According to Sean Parker, Pittman is the only media mogul who’s genuinely an entrepreneur. In giving him its first-ever 'Media Visionary" award, advertising publication Adweek [3] referred to him as a "jack of all media" and former MTV executive Tom Freston referred to him as "the wonder boy of branding."
Recognized for his creativity and risk taking, Pittman stated in a Cannes Lions TV interview[4] with musician and Oscar-winning actor Jared Leto at the 2014 Cannes Lions International Festival of Creativity that “Someone told me early on when you are trying to solve a problem it’s the mix of math and magic. Understanding the problem, the analytical and then you need to have the creativity, you got to have the first of a magical ideal to solve the problem and I think that is what creativity is.”
In addition during a conversation with USA Today at the Festival Pittman also offered insights on how to bring about professional triumphs advising readers to “Have faith in gut feelings.”[5]



Contents


1 Biography

1.1 Early life
1.2 MTV Years
1.3 Quantum Media and Time Warner
1.4 Century 21 Real Estate
1.5 America Online and AOL Time Warner
1.6 Pilot Group
1.7 Clear Channel Media Holdings, Inc. and iHeartMedia, Inc.
1.8 Recent years
1.9 Awards and honors
1.10 Personal life


2 References



Biography[edit]
Early life[edit]
Son of a Methodist minister, Pittman was born in Jackson, Mississippi, but raised in Brookhaven and became a radio announcer at the age of 15 to earn money for flying lessons.[6] He was an announcer in a number of cities and then successfully programmed radio stations in Pittsburgh, Chicago and finally at the NBC flagship station, WNBC-AM, in New York when he was 23 years old. He also produced and co-hosted a music video and news show in 1978 that ran on NBC's O&O Television stations. He did learn to fly, and has been a pilot for almost 40 years: He now has over 6,000 flight hours; currently holds an Airline Transport Pilot's license for airplanes; and is rated for helicopters and 3 types of jets.
MTV Years[edit]
At MTV, he oversaw the creation and growth of MTV and the transition of Nickelodeon from a failing network geared to preschoolers to the highest rated channel aimed at older kids as well as overseeing the launches of VH-1 and Nick at Nite, and led the initial public offering for MTV Networks and its expansion into international markets.[7] Under Pittman's leadership, MTV became the first profitable cable network; then-Time Warner Co-Chairman and Co-Chief Executive Officer Steve Ross also noted that MTV became the most profitable basic cable network during Pittman's tenure there.[8] For his development of the MTV brand, Advertising Age selected Pittman in 2010 as one of the ten most influential marketers who transformed American Culture.[9]
Quantum Media and Time Warner[edit]
After MTV, Pittman founded Quantum Media with MCA (one of the company's ventures was the Morton Downey Jr. show, an early television shock talk show), and in 1989, he bought out MCA, sold the assets to Warner Communications and became senior advisor to Warner Communications CEO Steve Ross just as Warner was merging with Time Inc. to create Time Warner.[10] In 1990, Pittman was appointed President and CEO of Time Warner Enterprises, the new business group of Time Warner, and in 1991 became Chairman and CEO of Six Flags Theme Parks where his team oversaw the revitalization of the Six Flags brand, taking attendance from 17 million to 25 million using a “classic second-place strategy” with their “Bigger than Disneyland, closer to home” positioning of the brand.[11]
Century 21 Real Estate[edit]
After Pittman led a process that led to Time Warner selling a controlling interest in Six Flags to Boston Ventures in 1995, he left to join Century 21 Real Estate as CEO. Pittman and his team grew Century 21 Real Estate through a strategy which included brand-building and national marketing, a new franchise sales organization, and the early adoption of the Internet as a lead-generating tool.
America Online and AOL Time Warner[edit]
While at Century 21, Pittman met Steve Case and joined the board of directors of America Online, Inc.; he joined the company as president of AOL Networks in 1996 and later became President and COO of America Online Inc. While at AOL, Pittman led the operating team that moved AOL from 6 million members to over 30 million; took the company profitable; introduced mass market advertising as a revenue source; and continued the mission of making the Internet as easy for consumers to use as the telephone or television. The company’s most memorable ad of that time had the tagline “America Online: So easy to use, no wonder it’s number one”. After AOL merged with Time Warner in 2001, Pittman became the Co-COO (and eventually COO) of the combined AOL Time Warner before leaving the company in 2002.[12]
Pilot Group[edit]
Pittman joined a number of his longtime operating team colleagues when he co-founded Pilot Group LLC, a private investment firm based New York in 2003. Pilot and its individual operating partners continue to have controlling investments in Tasting Table,[13] a leading epicurean digital content company, The Casa Dragones Tequila Company,[14] and Pure Wow, a digital content company targeted to the accomplished female audience.
Pilot Group previously owned and sold investments including Thrillist, which recently sold stakes to Axel Springer and Oak Capital); DailyCandy, sold to Comcast Ventures for a reported $125 million;[15][16] IdealBite, which was sold to the Walt Disney Company; and entertainment research company OTX (sold to Ipsos America).[17] Pilot also owned and sold significant minority investments in David's Bridal and Nutrisystem, and owned and sold the Barrington Broadcasting television group to Sinclair Broadcast Group in 2013 for $370 million and its radio station group Double O Radio to a variety of regional radio station groups including Town Square Media. Pilot and Pittman have also held various minority positions in digital content and technology venture companies including social gaming company Zynga, in which Pilot was an early investor; Huffington Post and Facebook.
Clear Channel Media Holdings, Inc. and iHeartMedia, Inc.[edit]
In November 2010, Pittman took on the role of Chairman of Media and Entertainment Platforms for Clear Channel and made a personal equity investment in the Company. In this role, Pittman worked to leverage the Company's media assets and spearhead the further development of a digital strategy for Clear Channel Radio, particularly with regard to its iHeartRadio digital radio platform, and today, iHeartMedia, Inc. is a multi-platform media and entertainment leader, with assets across broadcast radio; digital; mobile; social; outdoor; data; and live events. Pittman played a pivotal role in developing the iHeartRadio Music Festival, the biggest live concert festival in radio history, the first of which took place in Las Vegas on September 23–24, 2011 in conjunction with the launch of the New iHeartRadio.[18] The company has since expanded its national tentpole live events platform to include the nationally televised iHeartRadio Music Awards; the iHeartRadio Country Festival; iHeartRadio Fiesta Latina; the iHeartRadio Summer Pool Party; and the iHeartRadio Jingle Ball Tour. In December 2016, the company launched its two new on demand subscription platforms, iHeartRadio Plus and iHeartRadio All Access.
Following the transformation of the company in September 2014 to iHeartMedia, Inc. to better reflect the company's multi-platform focus, Bob Pittman became Chairman and CEO of iHeartMedia, Inc. and Chairman and CEO of Clear Channel Outdoor Holdings (after originally serving as Chairman of Clear Channel Media and Entertainment Platforms from November 2010 – October 2011). In this role, Pittman oversees all of the company's global media properties.
In conjunction with this position, Pittman also maintains his role as Founding Member of Pilot Group and continues his activities as a venture investor; in an indication of his continued interest in emerging technologies and businesses, he also serves on the board of live social video company Airtime. With his return to radio, Huffington Post’s media business expert Charles Warner dubbed him “best radio programmer ever”[19] and in 2011 he was ranked by Radio Ink magazine as the "Most Powerful Man in Radio." "Never before has anyone taken the number one slot on the list in their inaugural year," stated Radio Ink Publisher/CEO B. Eric Rhoads.[20] Pittman retained that designation in 2012, 2013 and 2014.
Recent years[edit]
Pittman is a philanthropist, building community and philanthropic projects into businesses he managed from Live Aid at MTV to educational efforts using the Internet at AOL. He is former chairman of the non-profit Robin Hood Foundation, which fights poverty in New York City, and still serves on the board; and is former chairman of the New York Public Theater. He is also on the boards of the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame and the Lupus Research Alliance. He is a former board member of the non-profit New York City Ballet as well as Electronic Arts, Atari Games, Excite, 3DO, MTV Networks, America Online, HFS/Cendant/Realogy, NYU Medical Center, and AOL Time Warner.
Pittman is one of the minority owners of the New York Mets, holding a 4% stake in the baseball team.[21]
Awards and honors[edit]
Pittman's many honors include: Robert F. Kennedy Memorial’s 2000 “Ripple of Hope Award”[22] for his commitment to civic and community affairs and his contributions to the advancement of education; induction into the Advertising Hall of Fame and the Broadcasting and Cable Hall of Fame; received AdWeek's first Media Visionary award in 2013 and Cablevision Magazine's "20/20 Vision" award for the 20 people who have had the greatest impact on the cable industry; selection as one of Advertising Age's "10 Marketers Who Changed American Culture” and "50 Pioneers and Visionaries of TV" and recognition as one of Business Week magazine's Top 25 Executives of 1998. He was also named one of Life Magazine's "Five Original Thinkers of the '80s"; recognized as the eighth of Life Magazine's "50 Most Influential Boomers"; included in Time Magazine's 1984 Man-of-the-Year issue "Seven Others who Succeeded"; received the "Star of Hope Award” in January 2014 from the Community Foundation of Northwest Mississippi; was named Success Magazine’s “Pioneer of the New American Start-Up” in 1989; received the 1986 White House Conference on Small Business Award for Entrepreneurial Excellence and the 1984 Council of Fashion Designers of America award; Performance Magazine’s 1982 “Innovator of the Year” award for his work developing MTV and Billboard Magazine’s “Radio Program Manager of the Year” in 1977. In October 2012, he was awarded the Henry A. Grunwald Award for Public Service by Lighthouse International. He also received the American Academy of Achievement’s Golden Plate award; International Teleproduction Society’s Lifetime Achievement International Monitor Award and The President's Award and an Honorary Doctorate from Bank Street College of Education, the school's highest honor, for his many contributions to the advancement of education.
Personal life[edit]
Pittman married Sandy Hill, a merchandise editor at Mademoiselle, in July 1979; they divorced in 1997. They have one son. He married Veronique Choa in 1997. They have two children.
References[edit]


^ New York Times coverage of Robert W. Pittman
^ Smith, Ethan (October 3, 2011). "Pittman to Run Clear Channel". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ "Adweek" MTV Founder Bob Pittman Is Our First Media Visionary
^ "Cannes Lions TV" on YouTube
^ USA Today coverage of Robert W. Pittman
^ Marr, Merissa (October 15, 2012). "Pittman Envisions New Life for Radio". The Wall Street Journal. pp. B1, B4. Retrieved October 15, 2012. 
^ CNN coverage of Pittman
^ New York Times, op cit
^ Advertising Age, 10 Marketers Who Transformed American Culture
^ Businessweek coverage of Pittman's ventures
^ [1]
^ New York Times, op cit
^ Landman, Beth. "MTV Founder Bob Pittman Launches Tasting Table Today". New York Magazine. Retrieved 6 October 2008. 
^ Jason Del Rey (September 12, 2001). "Entrepreneurs in the News". Inc. 
^ Comcast Sets Deal to Buy Daily Candy
^ [2]
^ Wrap Staff (January 28, 2010). "Ipsos Buys Online Research Firm OTX". The Wrap. 
^ "Breaking News". USA Today. September 23, 2011. 
^ Warner, Charles (March 23, 2011). "Bob Pittman Is Just What Radio Needs". Huffington Post. 
^ [3]
^ Brian Costa (March 20, 2012). "Meet the Mets (Minority Owners): Bob Pittman, Kenneth Lerer". Wall Street Journal. 
^ "AOL's Bob Pittman to Receive Ripple of Hope Award; Mrs. Robert Kennedy to Present Award at New York Gala." U.S. Newswire. US Newswire. 2000. Retrieved September 22, 2009 from HighBeam Research: http://www.highbeam.com/doc/1P2-18885525.html








v
t
e


iHeartMedia



Corporate officers



Bob Pittman (Chairman/CEO)





Board of directors



Lowry Mays
Irving Azoff
B. J. "Red" McCombs
J. C. Watts
John H. Williams





Radio stations



List of radio stations owned by iHeartMedia





Radio networks



Fox Sports Radio
Premiere Networks
Premium Choice
Total Traffic and Weather Network





Miscellaneous



Clear Channel Outdoor
Clear Channel UK
iHeartRadio
List of programming syndicated by iHeartMedia
Mediabase
Radio Computing Services










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Robert_Pittman_(media_executive)&oldid=780799508"					
Categories: 1953 birthsLiving peopleAmerican businesspeopleAmerican business executivesAmerican television company foundersAmerican MethodistsAmerican philanthropistsPeople from Brookhaven, MississippiBusinesspeople from Jackson, MississippiAmerican corporate directorsAOL peopleMTV executivesIHeartMedia, Inc.Hidden categories: Articles with hCards 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 17 May 2017, at 07:48.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 














About Us





















HomeAbout UsCommercialResidentialContact Us 











HomeAbout Us




обзоры планшетовсоздать сайт на Joomla

					About Us			

Super User08 May 2014Uncategorised






We love to work with customers to make their dreams come true. The more abstract the project the better. The challenge to complete a project on budget and in time is what makes the experience exciting. Robert W. Pittman III started working in the field with his father (Scott V. McGowan) and Grandfather (Hampton D. Batton) installing and finishing drywall with the utmost respect to the trade. Spending countless days and nights making sure the final product was far above standard. Learning to only settle for the best product. This has carried over to the passion we hold for home and commercial construction projects today. Every project holds the utmost importance and is held to highest expectations.
We have completed residential projects ranging from new home project to complete remodels of existing homes and commercial projects ranging from tenant build outs to ground up construction.
 
купить планшет Pipoновости seo




  





Quality you deserve.


Dependability you can count on.


 








 
2013 Customer Satisfaction
YOOtheme won again the J.O.S.C.A.R for the best Joomla Template Framework.


 
2012 Customer Sati
Our first J.O.S.C.A.R was won on the J and Beyond event in Kerkrade, Netherlands.




 




 

HomeAbout UsCommercialResidentialContact Us


Robert W. "Bob"  Pittman   by Braiden Smith on PreziCreateExploreLearn & supportGet startedLog inPricingGet startedLog inMy PrezisExploreLearn & supportProductCompanyCareersSupportCommunityContactAppsEnglishEspañol한국어日本語DeutschPortuguêsFrançaisMagyarItaliano×Houston, we have a problem!Oops. A firewall is blocking access to Prezi content. Check out this article to learn more or contact your system administrator.
            Stand out and be remembered with Prezi,  
            the secret weapon of great presenters.
        
                    Get started today
                
                    Get started
                
            What is Prezi?
            
                Learn more
            
                Loading presentation...
            
        You’re using the new, improved player. You can always go back to the old viewer.
    Switch back
            
                
                    Public
                
            
            
                & reusable
            
        
            Create your own
        
                    Make a copy
                
    Share

        Embed
    
                Liked
            
                Like
            Present Remotely Send the link below via email or IMCopy Present to your audienceStart remote presentationInvited audience members will follow you as you navigate and presentPeople invited to a presentation do not need a Prezi accountThis link expires 10 minutes after you close the presentationA maximum of 30 users can follow your presentationLearn more about this feature in our knowledge base article
    Do you really want to delete this prezi?

    Neither you, nor the coeditors you shared it with will be able to recover it again.
DeleteCancelMake your likes visible on Facebook?
        Connect your Facebook account to Prezi and let your likes appear on your timeline.
        You can change this under Settings & Account at any time.
    No, thanksConnect with FacebookRobert W. "Bob"  Pittman  
                            
                                No description
                            
                        
        
            by Braiden Smith
        
        on 11 October 2013
    TweetComments (0)
                                    Please log in to add your comment.
                                Report abuseTranscript of Robert W. "Bob"  Pittman  Robert W. "Bob"  Pittman  MTVOn August 1st, 1981 MTV, (Music Television) aired for the first time and was originally only available to households on New Jersey. MTV then became an influential source of pop culture and entertainment in the United States and other parts of the world including Europe, Asia and Latin America, which all have MTV- branded channels. Back Round MTV *Born December 28. 1953*Radio announcer at age 15 *CEO of Clear Channel Communications, AOL, Six Flags Theme Park, Quantum Media, Century 21 Real Estate and Time Warner Enterprise. *Also COO of American Online, Inc. and AOL Time Warner. *Growth of nickelodeon *August 1st, 1981, MTV In MTV's early days, its programming consisted of basic music videos that were provided by free record companies. As the record industry saw MTV as a, "promotional vehicle" money was quickly invested in making more exciting and creative videos. MTV was important in promoting the careers of performers such as Madonna, Michael Jackson and Prince, whose videos played continuously. By the late 1980s, MTV started airing non-video programming that strayed toward teen audiences. MTV quickly developed a reputation of pushing the cultural boundaries. Historically MTV revolutionized the music industry.VH1 Fuse MTV2 CMT  Video Music Awards Celebrities Nothing to go from Geographical MTV studios is located in Broadway, NY. Available any where in the world GovernmentalFCC EconomicallyHigh RatingsAdsAs MTV rapidly grew more popular, it was easier to raiser awareness for many causes occurring around the world. "It's Your Sex Life" Campaign "Fight For Your Rights: Take a Stand Against Discrimination.""Choose or loose"ImpactsVery Popular Influential Raises Awareness Negative ImpactsBad influences on younger audiencesPittman no longer works for MTV. He now focuses his time on Clear Channel Communications. MTV is the largest television network of its time. It reaches about 264 million households in 140 countries. CitationsMazzaccaro , Brianna . "Robert Pittman ." Father of MTV. Junior Division Group Website . Web. 8 Oct 2013. <http://robertpittmanmtv.weebly.com/>."Robert Pittman ." Wikipedia . N.p., 8 October 2013. Web. 8Oct 2013. <http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Robert_Pittman_(media_executive)>."MTV launches ." History . N.p., n.d. Web. 8 Oct 2013. <http://www.history.com/this-day-in-history/mtv-launches>.Full transcriptMore presentations by
    
        
            Braiden Smith
        Why should animals haveUntitled PreziUntitled Prezi
            More prezis by author
        Popular presentationsSee more popular or the latest prezisPreziProductGalleryThe ScienceConversational PresentingFor BusinessTestimonialsCompanyAboutTeamCareersOur ValuesPressOur CustomersContact UsLanguages
                    English
                
                    Español
                
                    한국어
                
                    日本語
                
                    Deutsch
                
                    Português
                
                    Français
                
                    Magyar
                
                    Italiano
                InfogramChartsInfographicsSupportPrezi Next SupportPrezi Classic SupportBlog18 July 2017The Presentation Remote That’s Always in Your Pocket17 July 2017On-Demand Webinar: How to Design Conversational Presentations Like an Expert11 July 2017Free Download: How to Create a Sales Presentation That Closes DealsSee all© 2017 Prezi Inc. TermsPreziProductGalleryThe ScienceConversational PresentingFor BusinessTestimonialsInfogramInfogramChartsInfographicsCompanyAboutTeamCareersOur ValuesPressOur CustomersContact UsSupportPrezi Next SupportPrezi Classic SupportLanguages
                                English
                            
                                Español
                            
                                한국어
                            
                                日本語
                            
                                Deutsch
                            
                                Português
                            
                                Français
                            
                                Magyar
                            
                                Italiano
                            © 2017 Prezi Inc. TermsConnect your Facebook account to Prezi and publish your likes in the future. OkNo, thanks


The Museum of Broadcast Communications - Encyclopedia of Television - Pittman, Robert W.











PITTMAN, ROBERT 
 W.
U.S. Media Executive








Robert 
 W. Pittman was listed in the Spring 1995, Advertising Age special 
 TV 50th Anniversary Issue as one of "50 Who Made a Difference" in 
 the history of television. Known as "the father of MTV," at 27 he 
 created the programming for MTV--the Music Television cable network--launched 
 in 1981. MTV revitalized the music business and spawned the music 
 video industry, which in turn influenced an entire new generation 
 of television programming, production, and commercials that appealed 
 to "the MTV generation" of young viewers. 
Pittman 
 began his remarkable career at 15 as a disk jockey in radio in his 
 home town of Jackson, Mississippi. From there he went to Milwaukee, 
 Detroit, and at 18 got his first job in programming as the program 
 director of WPEZ-FM in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania. He took the Contemporary 
 Music formatted radio station to the top of the ratings in its younger 
 target demographics. He then moved to Chicago, and at 20 programmed 
 country music on NBC-owned WMAQ-AM, where the station shot up from 
 22nd to 3rd. WMAQ's success is considered one of the major programming 
 turn-around success stories in radio history. 
Pittman 
 duplicated the phenomenal success of WMAQ-AM when he was given the 
 responsibility of programming WMAQ's co-owned FM station, WKQX, 
 late in 1975, when he was 22. In one rating book he beat the long-time 
 Album-Oriented-Rock (AOR) leader in the market and made a debut 
 near the top of the target demographic ratings. In 1977 NBC sent 
 Pittman to New York to program the floundering WNBC-AM. Once again 
 the "Boy Wonder," as he was known in radio circles, led contemporary 
 music and personality formatted WNBC programming to the top of the 
 ratings in its target groups. Many knowledgeable radio programmers 
 and historians consider Pittman to have been the most successful 
 radio program director ever, primarily because of his spectacular 
 success in a variety of formats.
 
 His unusual combination of creative and analytic brilliance made 
 him a rare programmer: a research-oriented manager who understood 
 and could deal with the creative talents and egos of people in the 
 music industry, disk jockeys, and personalities such as Don Imus 
 (whom Pittman was instrumental in firing and then re-hiring at WNBC-AM). 
 It was this creative/analytic brilliance that led John Lack, the 
 Executive Vice President of Warner Satellite Entertainment Company 
 (WASEC) to hire Pittman as the programmer for the Movie Channel 
 in 1979 and give him his first television job. Although Lack had 
 conceived of doing an all-music channel filled with programs, it 
 was Pittman who develop the concept of an all video channel, where 
 record-company-produced videos would be programmed as records were 
 on a radio station. 
As 
 much as and perhaps more so than the music, it was the image, the 
 attitude, that made MTV not only an instant hit with the anti-establishment, 
 anti-authoritarian, under-30 audience it targeted. The network also 
 their new cultural icon, the first network for the under-30 generation, 
 designed for them by one of their own. From the inception, Pittman's 
 genius was in positioning MTV to be different from the over-the-air, 
 traditional networks (ABC, CBS, and NBC). He hired cutting-edge, 
 avant garde production houses to create logos that would be instantaneously 
 recognizable as not network logos, as not traditional 
 graphics or symbols or icons, and as not the network of any 
 young person's parents. He made sure it would be impossible for 
 any young person to click by MTV on a television set and mistake 
 it for any other network or station. Immediate recognition and a 
 unique look were his goals. 
Another 
 facet of Pittman's brilliance was his ability to conceptualize programming. 
 He postulated a new theory to explain how young people who grew 
 up with television consumed it differently from their parents. The 
 older generation, he suggested, watched TV as they read books, in 
 a linear way. The new television generation, he believed, processed 
 TV in a non-linear manner, processing visual information much faster 
 than the older, non--TV generation, processing it non-sequentially, 
 non-linearly, without being confused by brief, disjointed images. 
 From this insight came the distinct style of MTV. 
But 
 programmers are often impractical. They often let their creativity 
 run amok and break budgets. Still another facet of Pittman's genius 
 was his business savvy. MTV was the first basic cable network to 
 become profitable. The record companies paid for the programming--the 
 videos--just as they gave radio stations their records. MTV's programming 
 content was virtually free.
 
 The combination of business acumen and programming astuteness led 
 to Pittman's being named CEO of the MTV networks in 1983. In this 
 capacity, he oversaw the redesign and relaunch of Nickelodeon, the 
 creation of VH-1 and Nick at Nite, the expansion of MTV into global 
 markets--Europe, Australia, and Japan--and the company's 1984 initial 
 public offering on the stock market. 
In 
 1987 Pittman left MTV after an unsuccessful attempt to buy out the 
 network and co-founded Quantum Media with MCA. Quantum Media produced 
 The Morton Downey Show, a television talk show and the innovative 
 police documentary, The Street. Quantum Media was sold to 
 Time-Warner in 1989, and Pittman became an executive assistant to 
 Steve Ross. In 1990 he was named CEO of Time-Warner Enterprises 
 and took over the additional responsibil-ities of being chief executive 
 of Six Flags amusement parks, majority owned by Time-Warner. As 
 he did at radio stations and cable networks, he re-vitalized Six 
 Flags, and made the company extremely profitable. 
Truly 
 one of television's visionary change masters, Bob Pittman took the 
 TV of William S. Paley, Robert Sarnoff, and Leonard Goldenson from 
 the Golden Age out to the cusp of the 21st century and gave a new 
 generation of viewers what they wanted---their MTV. 
-Charles 
 Warner 
 



Photo courtesy 
 of Robert Pittman/Jay Brady Photography
ROBERT 
 PITTMAN. Born in Jackson, Mississippi, U.S.A., 28 December 1953. 
 Attended Millsaps College, Jackson, Mississippi. Married Sandy; 
 child: Bo. Started as a 15-year old disk jockey, Jackson, Mississippi, 
 1968; worked in radio in Milwaukee and Detroit; program director, 
 WPEZ-FM, Pittsburgh, 1971; program director, WMAQ-AM, Chicago, 1973; 
 program director, WMAQ-FM, 1975; program director, WNBC-AM, 1977; 
 producer and host, weekly video music show for NBC-owned television 
 stations, 1978; program director, The Movie Channel, 1979; head 
 of programming, Warner Amex Satellite Entertainment; created programming 
 for Music Television (MTV), 1981; president and chief executive 
 officer, MTV Networks, 1983-87; co-founder of Quantum Media (with 
 MCA), 1987; sold Quantum Media to Warner Communications, 1989; president 
 and chief executive officer, Time-Warner Enterprises, 1988-91; president 
 and chief executive officer, Six Flags Entertainment, 1990-95; chief 
 executive officer, Century 21 Real Estate, since 1995; Board of 
 Directors, America Online, since 1995.  
TELEVISION 
 SERIES 
1988-89 
 The Morton Downey Jr. Show (syndicated)
 1989-92 Totally Hidden Video
 
 TELEVISION SPECIAL 
1988 
 The Street
 
 PUBLICATION
 
 "We're Talking the Wrong Language to 'TV Babies.'" The New York 
 Times, 24 January 1994. 
FURTHER 
 READING 
"Bob 
 Pittman." Time (New York), 7 January 1985. "50 Who Made a Difference." 
 Advertising Age (New York), Spring 1995. 
Lewis, 
 Lisa. Gender Politics and MTV: Voicing the Difference. Philadelphia, 
 Pennsylvania: Temple University Press, 1990.
 
 Powers, Ron. "The Cool, Dark Telegenius of Robert Pittman." GQ--Gentleman's 
 Quarterly. March 1989. 
_______________. 
 The Beast, The Eunuch and the Glass-Eyed Child: Television in 
 the '80s. New York: Harcourt Brace Jovanovich, 1990.
 
 
 See also Music 
 on Television; Music 
 Television (MTV) 
 
 







 


 








The Couple of the Minute | Michael Gross



































Michael Gross







 


The Couple of the MinuteDoing good with Bob and Sandy Pittman.




					By Michael Gross
Originally published in the July 30, 1990 issue of New York Magazine
				

“I HAVE NOTHING TO TALK ABOUT,” ROBERT W. PITTMAN SAYS, his Mississippi drawl in fast-forward. The words come across the phone as quickly as images on MTV, the music network he once ran. “I’m in the press too much. It looks awful. It’s deadly. I’ve got nothing going on. If there was a reason, okay, but it’s deadly. I’m disturbed my profile is as high as it is. I’m afraid to go out.”
But go out he does with Sandy, his Jackie Kennedy-look-alike wife, relentlessly raising that profile. Even when Bob was hobbling on crutches after breaking his hip last year, the Pittmans hopped from high-profile fashion parties to charity benefits to dinners at Punsch, working rooms, posing for paparazzi, and holding court. And hold court they should, for Bob, now head of a Time Warner business-development unit, and Sandy, a former fashion stylist turned outdoors entrepreneur, are the couple of the minute, the latest prince and princess of the city.
They met as two ambitious young arrivals from the sticks and became prototypical young achievers. Constantly moving with the times, they charged into the city’s New Society circuit in the late eighties, showing off their power, style, connections, achievements, and acquisitions at every opportunity. Now, in the nineties, friends are describing Bob, 36, and Sandy, 35, as avatars of the new altruism. But they are also symbols of the new defensiveness, refusing, for instance, to be interviewed for this article.
“It invites sniping,” Bob explains in our one phone conversation for the record. “You know what? I’m the luckiest S.O.B. ever walked out of Mississippi. But it’s troubling at a certain point. You’d like to get involved, but charities think you’re only in it for P.R.” To be a part of these new, quieter, do-good times, it’s better for them not to be seen promoting themselves. Anyway, they’ve done enough of that already.
Bob Pittman came out of Mississippi as the quintessential baby-boomer, boasting that he had the attention span of a flea. He also had the slick soul of a marketing genius raised on nothing but rock and television. Ever since he became a teenage D.J. in Jackson, Mississippi, in 1970, he has played a public role. Though he never graduated from any of the four colleges he attended, in 1977, at 23, he was named the program director of WNBC radio in New York. A few months later, he’d parlayed that position into starring roles in the station’s television commercials and on a late-night rock TV show.
In 1979, Pittman married Sandy Hill, 24, a merchandising editor at Mademoiselle magazine. Three years later, as a senior vice-president of the Warner Amex Satellite Entertainment Company, Bob was put in charge of the infant music network MTV. “All I worry about is winning,” he told the New York Times.
The onetime hippie from Mississippi had turned into a full-fledged yuppie. In 1984, he was a runner-up to Time magazine’s Man of the Year, Pete Ueberroth. The next year, Sandy started a fashion-video company and began running charity benefits, and Bob tried to lead a group of executives in a leveraged buy-out of MTV but lost the company to Viacom.
Pittman left MTV in 1987 to launch a co-venture with MCA, Inc., which invested more than $15 million in Quantum Media-Pittman’s dream of a multifaceted entertainment company for the nineties. He wanted to be the youngest, brashest Turk — the Donald Trump — of the media kingdom. Nowadays, he is pursuing the same vision at Time Warner by day and mingling with business, entertainment, and social stars by night. Gentleman Bob even escorted Ivana Trump to her car one recent gala night and told WWD how gratified he was by the experience.
* * *
IT’S A GOOD LIFE. THE PITTMANS HAVE BEGUN ACCUMULATING modern art and have made it onto several high-powered charity and cultural boards, from the New York Shakespeare Festival’s to the Coro Eastern Center’s. Bob pilots his own plane on his frequent trips to the Coast. Sandy has skied the back bowls at Aspen, kayaked in the Arctic Circle, trekked in Nepal, and backpacked in the Grand Tetons. In doing all this, the pair have generated newspaper articles, and profiles in magazines like Esquire, GQ, and HG, and enough party-page photos and mentions in gossip columns to line the walls of their Central Park West apartment, their 9,000 square-foot converted barn in Connecticut, and maybe, soon, Sandy’s compact but impressive two-seat helicopter.
Now Sandy is switching into career high gear herself, working on what friends describe as an ambitious plan to become the Martha Stewart of the outdoors. “She was saying, `What do I do with my life?’ ” recalls a friend. “It was Bob’s idea. He’s so smart.” Though there are no deals yet, Sandy hopes to produce a series of books and videos on adventure-travel topics and maybe even a line of outdoor gear and clothing. An obsessively organized woman, she’s already at work on publicity-a series of articles in Mirabella about her active outdoor life.
All this casts some doubt on Pittman’s proclamation about keeping a low profile. At Isaac Mizrahi’s fashion show in April, for instance, Sandy told a fashion editor about her project, saying that her first step would probably be a book on mountain climbing. “Are you sure that’s the kind of climbing you’re writing about?” came the reply.
BOTH FRIENDS AND DETRACTORS describe the Pittmans as a perfect match. They are ambitious, attractive, directed, and well-spoken to the point of glibness. Bob is the son of a Methodist minister who moved around the state before finally settling in Brookhaven, Mississippi, when Bob was in junior high. He was the ultimate outsider-a scrawny church brat who had lost an eye when he was thrown from a horse at the age of six. But he was always ambitious. “Bob always wanted to be rich and famous,” his brother Tom once recalled. “That was clear … He said so.”
Sandy was raised in Los Gatos, in Northern California, the athletic daughter of a businessman who rented portable toilets. “She comes from pretty modest means,” says Beth Rudin DeWoody, a friend of the couple’s. A former Conde Nast coworker says, “To hear her description, she comes from a lot of money. But, in fact, her parents are very down-to-earth people, not at all like her.”
Before she came to New York, in the late seventies, Sandy led outdoor trips, went to UCLA, and worked in retail stores. By the time she was spotted by a Mademoiselle editor at a bus stop on her way to her first job in New York, at Bonwit Teller, she was perfectly packaged. When she started as a merchandising editor at Mademoiselle, she was married to Jerry Solomon, a businessman she’d met in California who is now president of ProServe, a Virginia sports marketing and management company. “He’s a player, too,” says a journalist who covers the tennis scene. “He’s very slick. He was very successful very young.” Sandy also seemed groomed for the fast track. “She was beautiful,” says Lisa Norris Eisner, a Conde Nast co-worker. “She was smart, ambitious, and always, always clever.”
“Sandy knew how to merchandise herself,” says another coworker. “She was so clear about what she wanted, and she’d aim right for the top. She was like a magazine article. How to look. How your house should look. How to have a conversation. You’d walk away thinking, Wow! There was a point when she could have gone in a different direction. The ambition was just a seedling then.”
Sandy’s employers found that ambition admirable. But they, too, say she may have carried it too far. “At that time,” says one, “Conde Nast had the illusion of family. People who’d been there for years were playing by the old rules. She didn’t play the game in that manner.” But she was a natural winner. A co-worker says that even when she and Solomon broke up, just before Christmas 1978, “she came back smelling like a rose.”
The following January, Sandy was on her way to Los Angeles, planning to continue on to San Francisco to visit her parents, when she spotted Bob Pittman across an airplane aisle. She thought he was attractive. “I gathered my strategy together as to how to talk to him,” she once said. She decided he’d be most attracted to her if he saw her reading The New Yorker, ” ’cause that says a lot about a person.” It was love at first sight. When their flight was diverted to San Francisco, they spent the night at her parents’, who were out of town. The next day, they took a romantic drive down the coast highway to Los Angeles. Back in New York, Bob filled Sandy’s apartment with roses. They married in July.
* * *
WHEN THEY MET, Bob, an itinerant radio D.J. and program director, had just moved from WNBC to the new Warner Amex Satellite Entertainment Company as program director for the Movie Channel. He quickly became a vice president in charge of programming for the Movie Channel as well as developing various other programs. Sandy changed jobs, too. She surprised her Mademoiselle bosses when she moved to Bride’s as beauty editor. “Everyone said, `My God. Why she?’ ” one top editor recalls. “It didn’t last very long.”
When she left to open her own fashion styling and event-planning business, she left behind few admirers. Co-workers have even formed a loose network over the years. One calls it “a Sandy Pittman Hate Club.” Members copy stories about the Pittmans, send them to one another, and “foam at the mouth and rip out our hair,” one co-worker says.
On August 1, 1981, MTV, the all-music cable network, became a reality if not an overnight success. MTV was reportedly losing $20 million a year in 1982. The next year, Sandy gave birth to the Pittmans’ only child, Robert Thomas, who is known as Bo, and Bob was named executive vice-president and chief operating officer of the Warner Amex networks. That same year, MTV ratings rose by 20 percent. By the fourth quarter, the network started turning a profit.
MTV itself was Bob Pittman’s first major national controversy. The question of who created it was the next one. Many articles have given him sole credit, and he has also claimed it. “MTV was a pet idea of mine,” he told the Daily News in 1986.
Others say MTV was conceived by John Lack, who hired Pittman. Lack won’t comment. “I’m not the guy you want to talk to about Bob and Sandy Pittman,” Lack says. “I’m uncomfortable discussing it.” In fact, the idea had been floating around for years. The 1977 show Album Tracks, with Pittman as host, featured clips of rockers like Kansas and Meatloaf. And Pittman says that at least one all-music channel was on the air in Georgia before MTV.
But Pittman still feels the sting of the controversy and backpedals when discussing the origins of MTV. “John Lack I love to death,” he says. “He got me the meeting with [then Warner chairman Steve] Ross and [American Express chairman] James Robinson. At the end of the day, they’re the ones who should claim credit, because they decided to spend the money.”
Still, Pittman became the unquestioned leader of MTV. In 1984, he supervised the revamping of another Warner Amex product, Nickelodeon. In 1985, he introduced the mellow video station VH-1, and a Nickelodeon offshoot, Nick at Nite. That same year, the company went public, and Pittman, MTV president David Horowitz, and a group of other executives put together a $477-million bid for the networks. Viacom gobbled them up in November, after Pittman’s attempt failed. A few days before Christmas, Viacom made him the president and CEO of MTV Networks, Inc.
But Pittman wanted more. By May 1986, he’d announced that he was going to resign. When he left MTV that fall, he had stock options worth more than $2.4 million-and a plan. Backed by MCA, Inc., he formed Quantum Media, Inc., with a mandate to build and buy companies across the entertainment board.
* * *
SANDY HADN’T BEEN RESTING, EITHER. AFTER BO’S BIRTH, she went back to work. In early 1985, the MTV influence was everywhere. Fashion videos produced by entrepreneurs like Christy Ferer of Vidicom, Inc., had been running for years on local and cable style shows and even on nationally syndicated programs like Entertainment Tonight. With her magazine background and her television husband, Sandy was perfectly positioned to take advantage of the situation.
Sandy Hill Pittman Productions went into video. “She was making her move,” a colleague says. “Sandy had this idea to do what Bob had done with MTV and make the same impact.” Her company biography describes her as “one of the pioneers of fashion videos.” But a video-industry source who knew her in those days describes her as “uppity and presumptuous.”
Help soon came from Don Ohlmeyer, who was best known as the former head of NBC Sports. More important for the Pittmans, Ohlmeyer had gone on to become an independent TV producer and head of the agency that placed commercials for his backer, Nabisco. When Ohlmeyer decided to put Nabisco’s commercials on MTV, he became one of the new network’s key supporters. He also produced MTV’s first Video Music Awards show, which was broadcast live from Radio City Music Hall in 1984. “Bob and Don became friends,” says a source in the video business. “The next thing you knew, Ohlmeyer opened a fashion-video division.” After Sandy co-produced a swimsuit video with Ohlmeyer, she shut down her company to become president of In Fashion, an Ohlmeyer division, in July 1985. She began making regular men’s-, women’s-, and swimwear fashion reports for ESPN and developing a daily fashion show.
That November, Sandy played a major part at two big New York events. She connected the nonprofit Fashion Group with Pittman and MTV, which not only provided footage and technical and creative support but underwrote a presentation on the music channel and its fashion influence. “Not too long after that,” says the group’s executive director, Lenore Benson, “Sandy came to talk to me about the possibility of becoming a Fashion Group production company.” It didn’t work out.
But a fashion-show benefit for Live Aid, Bob Geldof’s Ethiopian-relief organization, proved a professional bonanza. Sandy met and worked with Norma Kamali (who directed a video that Sandy co-produced for the benefit) and Details founder Annie Flanders, who was co-chairwoman of the evening with Sandy. The Fashion Aid benefit grew out of a dinner conversation that the Pittmans had one night with Harvey Goldsmith, a British concert promoter. Sandy offered to produce an American event simultaneously with one he’d planned for London. “She was very lovely, sweet, and enthusiastic,” says someone who helped run the show, “but I can’t think of one thing she did.”
What she did was get her husband interested in Details. A year later Bob Pittman offered to buy the magazine as a key piece in his plan for Quantum. “He wanted to use us to find young talent and give it a chance to be realized,” says Flanders. “He wanted to be in advertising, publishing, television, and give each of them synergy with the others. He had this vision of being the major company in young media.” But after long negotiations, the deal fell through in December 1986.
* * *
IT JUST WASN’T THE COUPLE’S MINUTE YET; SANDY’S BIG venture had problems, too. Fashion America was launched in April 1986 as a daily show on both the ESPN sports and Lifetime cable networks. During its fast-paced half-hour, the show featured fashion videos and runway footage provided by designers (just as MTV used programming paid for by record companies), interspersed with music videos, interviews, and style tips.
“Suddenly, somehow — stress the irony — Sandy became a player,” says a journalist who covered video. But despite its wide availability and the ministrations of two public relations companies, Fashion America was not renewed for a second season. “She was out of her league,” says someone who worked on the show. The division fizzled when Ohlmeyer moved to Los Angeles. Colleagues say she brushed the whole thing off. “She’s the type who’s got to succeed,” one says. “If her business isn’t going well, she goes on to something else with tremendous energy rather than trying to salvage it. It was clear always that she wanted to travel with the right crowd. Nouvelle society was just beginning.” That became her “something else.” She even started looking like a lady who lunched. A video executive noted the change at a conference in 1986. “Suddenly, there was a new Sandy, behind Chanel armor,” she says.
Meanwhile, it looked like Bob had another winner on his hands. “I didn’t want to turn 60 and still be known as Mr. MTV,” he said in 1987. That April, Quantum Media issued its first product, a home video of a Sugar Ray Leonard-Marvin Hagler prizefight. A year later, Quantum had two shows in national syndication on TV. The Morton Downey Jr. Show created the next Pittman controversy when the host took his new brand of confrontational television nationwide. The Street, Quantum’s second syndicated show, was a brave attempt at TV-verite — a cop show that used tough street language. Pittman was proving his success was no fluke.
But Quantum faltered. Pittman couldn’t assemble the capital he needed to acquire and develop businesses. Takeover attempts against J. Walter Thompson, the NBC radio stations, and a television-station group called TVX failed.
Quantum’s record company, QMI Music, released only one album-by Jimmy Davis and Junction, a Memphis band-and the TV division was shaken when Downey turned up in the papers with a swastika painted on his face. The Street went off the air after only 40 shows, killed by a writers’ strike.
Lots of other projects never got out of development. And Totally Hidden Video, which did make it onto Fox-TV, inspired accusations of plagiarism from Candid Camera creator Allen Funt, who had previously pitched a movie about himself to Quantum’s film division. The division was run by two film executives in Los Angeles, Mary Anne Page and Daniel Rogosin. “Bob Pittman told us he had been tapped to create the Universal Studios of the nineties, encompassing interactive television, records, and film,” Rogosin says. “There is a difference between what we were told and reality.” Quantum’s executives seemed indecisive. That was because Pittman was already talking to his former mentor, Warner chairman Steve Ross, about coming back home.
Their first discussions were in December 1988. In February 1989, the rumor that Pittman was leaving Quantum for Warner turned up in Liz Smith’s column. Nobody said anything to the film executives, but suddenly, their phones went cold. In March, they were told the company was closing. Pittman called Page after the separation was a fact. “I can get you a job with Quincy Jones,” he said.
The deal was delayed by the controversy surrounding the merger of Time Inc. and Warner, but finally, last March 22, the new entity announced that Pittman would head its unit for business and strategic development and entrepreneurial ventures. “He has a new idea every second,” Steve Ross has said of the young man some think he sees as his heir apparent.
Meanwhile, the Pittmans were acting like couple-of-the-minute contenders. Sandy told HG she spent a lot of time organizing her and Bob’s busy life. She arranged lavish parties like an Elvis Presley-theme Halloween do they threw in Connecticut. Guests who’d dressed as the singer and his wife, Priscilla, arrived to find the name ELVIS spelled out in big letters made of Jell-O, and a record-your-voice trailer parked nearby. P.R. woman Susan Blond and her husband, real-estate agent Roger Erickson, were impressed by a smaller scale production. “We were macrobiotic, so Sandy cooked a vegetable dinner herself,” Blond says. “She made eighteen different varieties of mushrooms.”
* * *
BUT SANDY ISN’T JUST PLAYING house. She is also involved with charities that are more socially acceptable than downtown fashion shows for Ethiopian relief. And there area lot of admirers on that benefit circuit. Meredith (Mrs. Tom) Brokaw, the chairwoman of the Coro center’s board, says she quickly noted Sandy’s intelligence, enthusiasm, and extensive connections.
As a board member, a participant in Toro’s mentor program, and a chairwoman of several dinners, Brokaw says, Pittman has proved herself “just a really hard worker, organized, with a lot of energy and a lot of what you look for in leadership.” Last year, Brokaw and her daughters traveled with Sandy to the Himalayas and came away even more impressed. “I really admire her spunk and spirit,” Brokaw says. “This was no princess out on a hike.”
Sandy is also very involved with the women’s tour group of the Central Park Conservancy. “Sandy’s pioneered tours in the north end of the park,” says a Conservancy staff member. “She even helped plan a park luncheon where she served edible park plants. She’s really sort of regular. She’s really got everything, and they’ve made it fast. She’s mink-and-manure. Catty comments can result.”
Beth Rudin DeWoody, who met the Pittmans two years ago, agrees. “Our agendas have changed,” she says. “The eighties were the go-go years. If Sandy is symbolic of the nineties, it’s because she’s committed to doing good.” A day later, DeWoody calls back. “Sandy’s not for sale,” she says. “She only works for what she truly believes in. People like her because she’s full of good ideas. And Sandy and Bob are always supportive of whatever I do. They donate money to a lot of charities.”
Bob gives his time, too. He’s chairman of the board of the New York Shakespeare Festival and a director of the One to One Foundation, a group that works with underprivileged children. Philanthropy and business mix in the latter case. Pittman was brought into the foundation by Raymond Chambers, an entrepreneur who reportedly just sold a piece of his Six Flags amusement parks to Pittman’s Time Warner unit.
“One can’t blame them for getting involved,” says Ken Lerer, a partner in Robinson, Lake, Lerer & Montgomery, a public relations firm. Lerer is another former colleague of Bob’s. “Photographers and glitz are baggage that come along with involvement,” he continues. “I know how much time they spend. They ask me for contributions all the time. For anybody to criticize that is repugnant when you have page-one stories in the New York Times talking about apathy on the rise. They shouldn’t be criticized. People should say thanks.”
But that’s not what everyone says. When Sandy was a cochairwoman of a benefit for Gay Men’s Health Crisis to celebrate Arista Records’ fifteenth anniversary, there were many disagreements and hard feelings. People involved with the evening are still furious, claiming Sandy did little after the initial meetings. Friends say she objected to the way the event was being run. Critics point out that she was listed in the benefit’s glossy program as contributing $25,000 to the evening when in fact she gave only a fraction of that-about $3,000. Geoffrey Knox, a spokesman for G.M.H.C., says that the $25,000 figure includes cash and “in kind” credit for her professional contributions.
* * *
“I’M AWED AND APPALLED BY THE INTENSITY of their desire to climb,” says a journalist who has known the Pittmans since the MTV years. Roger Altman strongly disagrees. The 44-year-old vice-chairman of The Blackstone Group got to know Pittman when his company backed several of Quantum’s acquisition attempts. “Bob is an ambitious guy, but so am I and most people I know,” Altman says. “Bob is not differentiated by ambition or hunger. Actually, Bob’s kind of laid-back.”
Indeed, most criticisms are directed at Sandy. “She gives him a lot of drive,” says an ex-friend. “She sees where to go and she wants to be there. A lot of that push is her. She sends presents, notes. It’s so calculated.”
Howard Rosenman, a film producer in Los Angeles, got such a present after vacationing with the Pittmans at the Time Warner villa in Acapulco. He and Sandy went parasailing together. Afterward, they convinced the very Democratic group back at the house that they’d met Dan and Marilyn Quayle and invited them back to the villa for drinks.
“It escalated into madness,” Rosenman says. “We got so into it we couldn’t get out. I asked Sandy, `What are we going to do?’”
At 5:45, just before the Quayles were due to arrive, a note, supposedly from the vice-president, was delivered to the house begging off but inviting Pittman and Rosenman to the White House. “We never let on that it was a joke,” Rosenman says. “Sandy then sent me the note, framed.”
Rosenman became an unabashed admirer. “They’re very unpretentious people,” he argues. “Very refreshingly honest. They like successful people, but who doesn’t? And who isn’t a social climber in New York except some homeless people?”
©1990 Michael Gross






Michael Gross

Biography
Selected Articles
Contact



Books

House of Outrageous Fortune
Unreal Estate
Model
740 Park
Rogues' Gallery
Genuine Authentic



Selected Profiles

Gary Kremen
Alec Baldwin
Beverly D'Angelo

Calvin Klein
Richard Gere


John F Kennedy, Jr
Linda Stein
Partick McCarthy
Isaac Mizrahi


Jonny Podell
William Wegman
Robert Pittman
Norman Pearlstine



Keep In Touch


Facebook
Twitter
Instagram
GoodReads.com
RSS









   Robert Pittman | America Online , Inc. | ZoomInfo.comPittman Robert W in Miami, Florida with Reviews - YP.comStart your search by typing in the business name below.
What do you want to find?

Where?My current locationSearchHomeMiami, FLPittman Robert WMiami, FL Pittman Robert WAbout Search ResultsAbout Search ResultsYP - The Real Yellow PagesSM - helps you find the right local businesses to meet your specific needs. Search results are sorted by a combination of factors to give you a set of choices in response to your search criteria. These factors are similar to those you might use to determine which business to select from a local Yellow Pages directory, including proximity to where you are searching, expertise in the specific services or products you need, and comprehensive business information to help evaluate a business's suitability for you. “Preferred” listings, or those with featured website buttons, indicate YP advertisers who directly provide information about their businesses to help consumers make more informed buying decisions. YP advertisers receive higher placement in the default ordering of search results and may appear in sponsored listings on the top, side, or bottom of the search results page.Sort:DefaultDefaultDistanceRatingName (A - Z)Sponsored LinksAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection1. Robert Pittman W701 Brickell AveMiami, FL 33131(786) 777-0205Legal Service PlansAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection2. Vale, Robert W200 Biscayne Boulevard WayMiami, FL 33131(305) 379-9112AttorneysAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection3. Turken, Robert W200 S Biscayne BlvdMiami, FL 33131(305) 789-9300AttorneysAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection4. Robert W Vale Aty201 S Biscayne BlvdMiami, FL 33131(305) 379-9112AttorneysAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection5. Landon III, Robert D W1441 Brickell AveMiami, FL 33131(305) 373-1000AttorneysWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection6. Vogt-Lowell, Robert W, MD7765 SW 87th Ave Ste 110Miami, FL 33173(305) 595-1833Physicians & SurgeonsWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection7. Rodriguez Robert W5040 NW 7th StMiami, FL 33126(305) 444-6617Real Estate AttorneysAttorneysAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection8. Wells Robert W9350 S Dixie Hwy Ste 1450Miami, FL 33156(305) 669-8989AttorneysWebsiteServicesAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection9. Jensen, Robert W4000 Ponce De Leon Blvd # 470Coral Gables, FL 33146(305) 444-0686AttorneysLegal Service PlansWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection10. Wells, Robert W, JD1450 Madruga AveCoral Gables, FL 33146(305) 669-8989AttorneysWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection11. Robert W Bailey MD Inc200 Crandon BlvdKey Biscayne, FL 33149(305) 361-1406Physicians & SurgeonsWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection12. Bailey Robert W MD Inc675 Allendale RdKey Biscayne, FL 33149(305) 361-1406Physicians & SurgeonsAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection13. Bailey Robert W MD Inc840 Harbor DrKey Biscayne, FL 33149(305) 361-1406Physicians & SurgeonsAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection14. Robert W Stewart PA Attorney18001 Old Cutler RdPalmetto Bay, FL 33157(305) 233-8773AttorneysAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection15. Fleigelman, Robert W, MD12012 Miramar PkwyMiramar, FL 33025(954) 438-6228Physicians & SurgeonsWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection16. Robert W Fleigelman, MD - Fleigelman Robert W MD3705 Garfield StHollywood, FL 33021(954) 265-3406Physicians & SurgeonsAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection17. Fleigelman, Robert W, MD140 S Federal HwyDania, FL 33004(954) 265-3406Physicians & SurgeonsWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection18. Stickney, Robert W320 SE 10th CtFort Lauderdale, FL 33316(954) 767-8908AttorneysAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection19. Robert, W Kelley700 SE 3rd AveFort Lauderdale, FL 33316(954) 522-6601AttorneysCriminal Law AttorneysWebsiteServicesAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection20. DR Robert W Baylis MD350 N Pine Island RdPlantation, FL 33324(954) 476-8800Physicians & Surgeons, OrthopedicsWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection21. Murphy Robert W1212 SE 2nd AveFort Lauderdale, FL 33316(954) 763-8660AttorneysCriminal Law AttorneysWebsiteServicesMake an AppointmentAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection22. Schlorff, Robert W. Law Office1995 E Oakland Park Blvd Ste 300Fort Lauderdale, FL 33306(954) 565-2550AttorneysFamily Law AttorneysWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection23. Robert W Sidweber PA3020 NE 32nd Ave Ste 301Fort Lauderdale, FL 33308(954) 563-3477Family Law AttorneysAttorneysWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection24. Robert W Fischer MD2466 E Commercial BlvdFort Lauderdale, FL 33308(954) 771-4195Physicians & SurgeonsWebsiteServicesSponsored LinksShowing1-24
of 24resultsMap ViewSponsoredBuchalter Hoffman & Dorchak Personal Injury Attorneys1075 NW 146th Street Dr, Miami, FL 33167(786) 401-5469WebsiteYP AdDirectionsVideoMore InfoLaw Offices of James A. Poe9500 S. Dadeland Blvd, Miami, FL 33156(786) 618-3683WebsiteYP AdDirectionsMore InfoSandy T. Fox, P.A.(1)2750 NE 185th St, Miami, FL 33180(786) 471-5221"Law Firm with a Focus on Divorce & Family Law"WebsiteCouponsVirtual TourYP AdDirectionsVideoMore InfoSamole Law Firm, P.A.9700 S Dixie Hwy Ste 630, Miami, FL 33156(305) 859-3173A Full Service Miami Law FirmWebsiteDirectionsMore InfoKaplan & Freedman9410 SW 77th Ave, Miami, FL 33156(305) 274-7533Trial Lawyers 35+ Years Trial ExperienceWebsiteDirectionsMore InfoLaw Office Of Stuart L Tockman12150 SW 128th Ct Ste 223, Miami, FL 33186(786) 214-6139WebsiteVirtual TourYP AdDirectionsMore InfoPollack Pollack & Kogan LLC44 W Flagler St Ste 2050, Miami, FL 33130(786) 369-4572Specializing in Business & Commercial LitigationWebsiteYP AdDirectionsMore InfoLaw Offices Of Paul M Kade9200 S Dadeland Blvd, Miami, FL 33156(786) 646-6837WebsiteDirectionsVideoMore InfoFrankel Robert P & Associates25 W Flagler St, Miami, FL 33130(305) 358-5690Contact Us For InformationWebsiteDirectionsMore InfoVer Ploeg & Lumpkin PA100 SE 2nd St, Miami, FL 33131(305) 577-3996Miami Insurance Coverage Dispute LawyersWebsiteServices OfferedDirectionsMore InfoPollack Pollack & Kogan LLC44 W Flagler St Ste 2050, Miami, FL 33130(786) 369-4572WebsiteDirectionsMore InfoZimmett & Zimmett PA9200 S Dadeland Blvd, Miami, FL 33156(305) 670-6555DirectionsMore InfoHorn Andrew W PA1 SE 3rd Ave, Miami, FL 33131(786) 501-2074No Case Too SmallWebsiteServices OfferedDirectionsMore InfoMcLuskey, McDonald & Hughes, P.A.8821 SW 69th Ct, Miami, FL 33156(305) 670-2020WebsiteSubmit FormYP AdDirectionsMore InfoLaw Office of Alex Solomiany PA999 Brickell Ave Ste Ph1102, Miami, FL 33131(305) 373-1105HELPING YOU ACHIEVE YOUR IMMIGRATION GOALSWebsiteCouponsLearn MoreVirtual TourDirectionsMore InfoLaw Offices Of Granoff & Kessler PA7990 SW 117th Ave, Miami, FL 33183(786) 577-5189WebsiteDirectionsMore InfoDiamond, Nathan P PA888 Biscayne Blvd, Miami, FL 33132(305) 371-5300WebsiteDirectionsMore InfoBuchbinder & Elegant PA46 SW 1st St, Miami, FL 33130(305) 358-1515DirectionsMore InfoGimenez & Carrillo5775 Blue Lagoon Dr Ste 300, Miami, FL 33126(786) 472-7546NO FEE UNLESS YOU WIN - Se Hable EspanolWebsiteView TestimonialsVirtual TourDirectionsMore InfoStokes & Gonzales Pa7300 N Kendall Dr Ste 519, Miami, FL 33156(786) 475-2079WebsiteDirectionsMore InfoPaul F. Penichet, P.A.(1)9655 S Dixie Hwy Ste 310, Miami, FL 33156(786) 408-2464Employment Law & DiscriminationWebsiteDirectionsVideoMore InfoBaird, Lisa A Divorce & Family Law Attorney10271 SW 72nd St Ste 103, Miami, FL 33173(305) 548-8852Best Family Divorce Attorney Law FirmWebsiteCouponsServices OfferedVirtual TourYP AdDirectionsVideoMore InfoPalmer Palmer & Mangiero PA12790 S Dixie Hwy, Miami, FL 33156(305) 378-0011DirectionsMore InfoLaw Offices of Alan E. Weinstein, LLC4500 Biscayne Blvd, Miami, FL 33137(305) 576-8666WebsiteDirectionsMore InfoGuerrero Eduardo R2655 S Le Jeune Rd, Miami, FL 33134(305) 529-5868Real Estate/Foreclosure/Business/DivorceWebsiteServices OfferedDirectionsVideoMore InfoKamilar, Mark2921 SW 27th Ave, Miami, FL 33133(305) 567-1112Contact Us For InformationWebsiteDirectionsMore InfoKaufman, Steven D8950 SW 74th Ct, Miami, FL 33156(786) 528-6730From $695.00 Uncontested, Court Cost Extra.WebsiteMake an AppointmentVirtual TourYP AdDirectionsVideoMore InfoPeckar & Abramson1 SE 3rd Ave, Miami, FL 33131(305) 859-3598Construction Law AttorneysWebsiteLearn MoreVirtual TourDirectionsMore InfoKirshner, Groff & Diaz5901 SW 74th St, Miami, FL 33143(305) 661-3633WebsiteDirectionsMore InfoBuchalter Hoffman & Dorchak Personal Injury Attorneys1075 NW 146th Street Dr, Miami, FL 33167(786) 401-5469WebsiteYP AdDirectionsVideoMore InfoDidn't find what you were looking for?magnifying glass 
We just redesigned yp.com! Do you like it?×            LikeNot a Fan×            Thank You!Feedback



403 - Forbidden: Access is denied.



Server Error


403 - Forbidden: Access is denied.
You do not have permission to view this directory or page using the credentials that you supplied.







403 - Forbidden: Access is denied.



Server Error


403 - Forbidden: Access is denied.
You do not have permission to view this directory or page using the credentials that you supplied.






Robert W. Pittman: Executive Profile & Biography - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 24, 2017 6:51 PM ET
Media

Company Overview of iHeartMedia, Inc.



SnapshotPeople 




OverviewBoard MembersCommittees



Executive Profile
Robert W. Pittman  Chairman & Chief Executive Officer, iHeartMedia, Inc.AgeTotal Calculated CompensationThis person is connected to 8 Board Members in 8 different organizations across 19 different industries.See Board Relationships63$4,654,672As of Fiscal Year 2016
Background

		Mr. Robert W. Pittman, also known as Bob, has been the Chairman of the Board at iHeartMedia, Inc. since May 17, 2013 and has been its Chief Executive Officer since October 2, 2011. Mr. Pittman has been the Chief Executive Officer of Clear Channel Outdoor Holdings Inc. since March 2, 2015. He serves as Chief Executive Officer and Chairman of Clear Channel Capital I LLC (alternate name iHeartMedia Capital I, LLC). He has been the Chairman at iHeartCommunications, Inc., ... since October 2, 2011 and its Chief Executive Officer since October 2011. He is a Co-Founder of Pilot Group, LLC. He founded Roberts Radio LLC. He served as the Chief Executive Officer of Clear Channel Media and Entertainment LLC from October 2, 2011 to January 2012 and America Online Latin America Inc. From May 2002 to July 2002, he served as Chief Operating Officer of AOL Time Warner, Inc. He served as Co-Chief Operating Officer of AOL Time Warner from February 1998 to January 2001. He served as the Chief Operating Officer of Time Warner Entertainment Company, L.P.(TWE) from May 2002 to July 2002. He served as the President, Chief Executive Officer and Chief Operating Officer of America Online Inc. from February 1998 to January 2001. He served as the President and Chief Operating Officer of Redgate Communications Corporation. He served as Co-Chief Operating Officer of Time Warner Inc. He began his career in radio as a disk jockey in Mississippi and ended his radio career as the head of programming for WNBC Radio in New York City in 1979. In the 1980s, he served as President and Chief Executive Officer of Quantum Media. He served as the Chief Executive Officer and Managing Partner of Cendant Corp.'s subsidiary, Century 21 Real Estate Corporation (alternate name Century 21 Real Estate LLC) from October 1995 to October 1996. He served as the President and Chief Executive Officer of AOL Networks from November 1996 to February 1998. He served as the President and Chief Executive Officer of Time Warner Enterprises, a division of TWE. He served as Chief Executive Officer of Clear Channel Outdoor Holdings Inc., from October 1995 to October 1996, MTV Networks Company (alternate name Viacom Media Networks) and Six Flags Theme Parks, Inc. He served as the Chief Executive Officer of Six Flags Entertainment Corporation from December 1991 to September 1995. He has been the Executive Chairman of Clear Channel Outdoor Holdings Inc. since October 2, 2011. He has been a Director of Clear Channel Outdoor Holdings Inc. since October 2, 2011 and Spot Runner, Inc. since December 2006. He has been a Director at iHeartMedia, Inc. since October 2, 2011. He serves as a Director of 3DO; Excite, Inc.; Robin Hood Foundation and New York City Ballet, Inc. Mr. Pittman serves as a Director of Alliance For Lupus Research, Inc., and the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame Foundation. He served as a Director of Time Warner Inc. He served as the Chairman of Robin Hood Foundation. He served as the Chairman of Media & Entertainment Platforms at Clear Channel Media and Entertainment LLC since November 2010. He served as the Chairman of Six Flags Entertainment Corporation from December 1991 to September 1995. He served as a Member of Advisory Board at iLike, Inc. He served as a Director of Warner Communications LLC since February 2, 2001. He served as a Director of Realogy Holdings Corp. since July 2006, Realogy Group LLC (Realogy Corporation) since August 2006; AMRE Inc. since November 15, 1995; Avis Budget Car Rental, LLC (Avis Budget Group, Inc.) since December 1997; American Television and Communications Corporation since January 1, 2001; America Online Latin America, Inc. since 1995; Electronic Arts Inc. since November 5, 2003; Hospitality Franchise Systems Inc. from July 1994 to December 1997; Cendant Corp. since December 1997 until August 2006 and HFS Incorporated July 1994 to December 1997. He served as a Director of Time Warner Entertainment Company, L.P. Mr. Pittman was inducted into the Broadcasting and Cable Hall of Fame and received the International Radio and Television Society's Gold Medal and a Council of Fashion Designers of America award. He was recognized in Life Magazine's “Five Original Thinkers of the 80's”, Advertising Age's “50 Pioneers and Visionaries of TV”, and Business Week's “Top 25 Executives of 1998”.Read Full Background




Corporate Headquarters
200 East Basse RoadSan Antonio, Texas 78209United StatesPhone: 210-822-2828Fax: --
Board Members Memberships
DirectorNew York City Ballet, Inc.DirectorRobin Hood FoundationDirectorLupus Research Alliance2006-PresentDirectorSpot Runner, Inc.2011-PresentChairman & Chief Executive OfficeriHeartMedia, Inc.2011-PresentExecutive Chairman and Chief Executive OfficerClear Channel Outdoor Holdings, Inc.2011-PresentChairman and Chief Executive OfficeriHeartCommunications, Inc.2013-PresentChairman, CEO, CEO & Director of Clear Channel Communications InciHeartMedia Capital I, LLC
Education
				There is no Education data available.
				Other Affiliations
Time Warner Inc.Avis Budget Group, Inc.Electronic Arts Inc.HFS IncorporatedRedgate Communications CorporationAMRE Inc.America Online Latin America Inc.Roberts Radio LLCTime Warner Entertainment Company, L.P.Clear Channel Media and Entertainment LLCAmerican Television and Communications CorporationWarner Communications LLCCentury 21 Real Estate LLCTM Viacom Media NetworksNew York City Ballet, Inc.Pilot Group, LLCAvis Budget Car Rental, LLCRobin Hood FoundationClear Channel Outdoor Holdings, Inc.Spot Runner, Inc.Realogy Holdings Corp.iLike, Inc.Lupus Research AllianceiHeartCommunications, Inc.Six Flags Theme Parks, Inc.Realogy Group LLCiHeartMedia Capital I, LLC


Annual Compensation
Salary$1,200,000Bonus$165,816Total Annual Compensation$1,365,816
Stocks Options
All Other Compensation$1,654,672Exercisable Options$630,000Total Number of Options$630,000
Total Compensation
Total Annual Cash Compensation$4,654,672Total Short Term Compensation$1,365,816Other Long Term Compensation$1,654,672Total Calculated Compensation$4,654,672




Request Profile Update
















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



COMPETITOR COMPENSATIONNamePosition/CompanyCompensationThomas  Ebeling Chairman of Executive Board, Chief Executive Officer and Acting Head of New MediaProSiebenSat.1 Media SE$2.0MMasaki  Miyauchi President & Representative DirectorFuji Media Holdings, Inc.--David M. Zaslav CEO, President & DirectorDiscovery Communications, Inc.$3.0MRobert J. Thomson Chief Executive Officer and DirectorNews Corporation$2.0MCompensation as of Fiscal Year 2016.










Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact iHeartMedia, Inc., please visit .  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close





























Robert Pittman (media executive) - Wikipedia






















 






Robert Pittman (media executive)

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Bob Pittman



Pittman on July 20, 2011



Born
Robert Warren Pittman
(1953-12-28) December 28, 1953 (age 63)
Jackson, Mississippi, US


Occupation
Businessman


Known for
MTV
iHeartMedia


Spouse(s)
Veronique Choa Pittman


Children
3


Robert Warren "Bob" Pittman (born December 28, 1953), is an American businessman. Currently Chairman and CEO of iHeartMedia, Inc. (formerly Clear Channel), a global media and entertainment company, Pittman led the team that created MTV (eventually becoming its President).[1] Pittman joined Clear Channel in November 2010 as an investor and the company’s Chairman of Media and Entertainment Platforms, was named CEO of iHeartMedia (formerly known as Clear Channel Communications)[2] in 2011 and was named Chairman in 2013. Clear Channel became iHeartMedia, Inc. in September 2014. Pittman has also been the CEO of MTV Networks, AOL, Six Flags Theme Parks, Quantum Media, Century 21 Real Estate and Time Warner Enterprises, and COO of America Online, Inc. and AOL Time Warner.
Pittman has also been a radio and TV programmer, marketer, investor and media entrepreneur who has had multiple careers in a number of consumer-focused industries. According to Sean Parker, Pittman is the only media mogul who’s genuinely an entrepreneur. In giving him its first-ever 'Media Visionary" award, advertising publication Adweek [3] referred to him as a "jack of all media" and former MTV executive Tom Freston referred to him as "the wonder boy of branding."
Recognized for his creativity and risk taking, Pittman stated in a Cannes Lions TV interview[4] with musician and Oscar-winning actor Jared Leto at the 2014 Cannes Lions International Festival of Creativity that “Someone told me early on when you are trying to solve a problem it’s the mix of math and magic. Understanding the problem, the analytical and then you need to have the creativity, you got to have the first of a magical ideal to solve the problem and I think that is what creativity is.”
In addition during a conversation with USA Today at the Festival Pittman also offered insights on how to bring about professional triumphs advising readers to “Have faith in gut feelings.”[5]



Contents


1 Biography

1.1 Early life
1.2 MTV Years
1.3 Quantum Media and Time Warner
1.4 Century 21 Real Estate
1.5 America Online and AOL Time Warner
1.6 Pilot Group
1.7 Clear Channel Media Holdings, Inc. and iHeartMedia, Inc.
1.8 Recent years
1.9 Awards and honors
1.10 Personal life


2 References



Biography[edit]
Early life[edit]
Son of a Methodist minister, Pittman was born in Jackson, Mississippi, but raised in Brookhaven and became a radio announcer at the age of 15 to earn money for flying lessons.[6] He was an announcer in a number of cities and then successfully programmed radio stations in Pittsburgh, Chicago and finally at the NBC flagship station, WNBC-AM, in New York when he was 23 years old. He also produced and co-hosted a music video and news show in 1978 that ran on NBC's O&O Television stations. He did learn to fly, and has been a pilot for almost 40 years: He now has over 6,000 flight hours; currently holds an Airline Transport Pilot's license for airplanes; and is rated for helicopters and 3 types of jets.
MTV Years[edit]
At MTV, he oversaw the creation and growth of MTV and the transition of Nickelodeon from a failing network geared to preschoolers to the highest rated channel aimed at older kids as well as overseeing the launches of VH-1 and Nick at Nite, and led the initial public offering for MTV Networks and its expansion into international markets.[7] Under Pittman's leadership, MTV became the first profitable cable network; then-Time Warner Co-Chairman and Co-Chief Executive Officer Steve Ross also noted that MTV became the most profitable basic cable network during Pittman's tenure there.[8] For his development of the MTV brand, Advertising Age selected Pittman in 2010 as one of the ten most influential marketers who transformed American Culture.[9]
Quantum Media and Time Warner[edit]
After MTV, Pittman founded Quantum Media with MCA (one of the company's ventures was the Morton Downey Jr. show, an early television shock talk show), and in 1989, he bought out MCA, sold the assets to Warner Communications and became senior advisor to Warner Communications CEO Steve Ross just as Warner was merging with Time Inc. to create Time Warner.[10] In 1990, Pittman was appointed President and CEO of Time Warner Enterprises, the new business group of Time Warner, and in 1991 became Chairman and CEO of Six Flags Theme Parks where his team oversaw the revitalization of the Six Flags brand, taking attendance from 17 million to 25 million using a “classic second-place strategy” with their “Bigger than Disneyland, closer to home” positioning of the brand.[11]
Century 21 Real Estate[edit]
After Pittman led a process that led to Time Warner selling a controlling interest in Six Flags to Boston Ventures in 1995, he left to join Century 21 Real Estate as CEO. Pittman and his team grew Century 21 Real Estate through a strategy which included brand-building and national marketing, a new franchise sales organization, and the early adoption of the Internet as a lead-generating tool.
America Online and AOL Time Warner[edit]
While at Century 21, Pittman met Steve Case and joined the board of directors of America Online, Inc.; he joined the company as president of AOL Networks in 1996 and later became President and COO of America Online Inc. While at AOL, Pittman led the operating team that moved AOL from 6 million members to over 30 million; took the company profitable; introduced mass market advertising as a revenue source; and continued the mission of making the Internet as easy for consumers to use as the telephone or television. The company’s most memorable ad of that time had the tagline “America Online: So easy to use, no wonder it’s number one”. After AOL merged with Time Warner in 2001, Pittman became the Co-COO (and eventually COO) of the combined AOL Time Warner before leaving the company in 2002.[12]
Pilot Group[edit]
Pittman joined a number of his longtime operating team colleagues when he co-founded Pilot Group LLC, a private investment firm based New York in 2003. Pilot and its individual operating partners continue to have controlling investments in Tasting Table,[13] a leading epicurean digital content company, The Casa Dragones Tequila Company,[14] and Pure Wow, a digital content company targeted to the accomplished female audience.
Pilot Group previously owned and sold investments including Thrillist, which recently sold stakes to Axel Springer and Oak Capital); DailyCandy, sold to Comcast Ventures for a reported $125 million;[15][16] IdealBite, which was sold to the Walt Disney Company; and entertainment research company OTX (sold to Ipsos America).[17] Pilot also owned and sold significant minority investments in David's Bridal and Nutrisystem, and owned and sold the Barrington Broadcasting television group to Sinclair Broadcast Group in 2013 for $370 million and its radio station group Double O Radio to a variety of regional radio station groups including Town Square Media. Pilot and Pittman have also held various minority positions in digital content and technology venture companies including social gaming company Zynga, in which Pilot was an early investor; Huffington Post and Facebook.
Clear Channel Media Holdings, Inc. and iHeartMedia, Inc.[edit]
In November 2010, Pittman took on the role of Chairman of Media and Entertainment Platforms for Clear Channel and made a personal equity investment in the Company. In this role, Pittman worked to leverage the Company's media assets and spearhead the further development of a digital strategy for Clear Channel Radio, particularly with regard to its iHeartRadio digital radio platform, and today, iHeartMedia, Inc. is a multi-platform media and entertainment leader, with assets across broadcast radio; digital; mobile; social; outdoor; data; and live events. Pittman played a pivotal role in developing the iHeartRadio Music Festival, the biggest live concert festival in radio history, the first of which took place in Las Vegas on September 23–24, 2011 in conjunction with the launch of the New iHeartRadio.[18] The company has since expanded its national tentpole live events platform to include the nationally televised iHeartRadio Music Awards; the iHeartRadio Country Festival; iHeartRadio Fiesta Latina; the iHeartRadio Summer Pool Party; and the iHeartRadio Jingle Ball Tour. In December 2016, the company launched its two new on demand subscription platforms, iHeartRadio Plus and iHeartRadio All Access.
Following the transformation of the company in September 2014 to iHeartMedia, Inc. to better reflect the company's multi-platform focus, Bob Pittman became Chairman and CEO of iHeartMedia, Inc. and Chairman and CEO of Clear Channel Outdoor Holdings (after originally serving as Chairman of Clear Channel Media and Entertainment Platforms from November 2010 – October 2011). In this role, Pittman oversees all of the company's global media properties.
In conjunction with this position, Pittman also maintains his role as Founding Member of Pilot Group and continues his activities as a venture investor; in an indication of his continued interest in emerging technologies and businesses, he also serves on the board of live social video company Airtime. With his return to radio, Huffington Post’s media business expert Charles Warner dubbed him “best radio programmer ever”[19] and in 2011 he was ranked by Radio Ink magazine as the "Most Powerful Man in Radio." "Never before has anyone taken the number one slot on the list in their inaugural year," stated Radio Ink Publisher/CEO B. Eric Rhoads.[20] Pittman retained that designation in 2012, 2013 and 2014.
Recent years[edit]
Pittman is a philanthropist, building community and philanthropic projects into businesses he managed from Live Aid at MTV to educational efforts using the Internet at AOL. He is former chairman of the non-profit Robin Hood Foundation, which fights poverty in New York City, and still serves on the board; and is former chairman of the New York Public Theater. He is also on the boards of the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame and the Lupus Research Alliance. He is a former board member of the non-profit New York City Ballet as well as Electronic Arts, Atari Games, Excite, 3DO, MTV Networks, America Online, HFS/Cendant/Realogy, NYU Medical Center, and AOL Time Warner.
Pittman is one of the minority owners of the New York Mets, holding a 4% stake in the baseball team.[21]
Awards and honors[edit]
Pittman's many honors include: Robert F. Kennedy Memorial’s 2000 “Ripple of Hope Award”[22] for his commitment to civic and community affairs and his contributions to the advancement of education; induction into the Advertising Hall of Fame and the Broadcasting and Cable Hall of Fame; received AdWeek's first Media Visionary award in 2013 and Cablevision Magazine's "20/20 Vision" award for the 20 people who have had the greatest impact on the cable industry; selection as one of Advertising Age's "10 Marketers Who Changed American Culture” and "50 Pioneers and Visionaries of TV" and recognition as one of Business Week magazine's Top 25 Executives of 1998. He was also named one of Life Magazine's "Five Original Thinkers of the '80s"; recognized as the eighth of Life Magazine's "50 Most Influential Boomers"; included in Time Magazine's 1984 Man-of-the-Year issue "Seven Others who Succeeded"; received the "Star of Hope Award” in January 2014 from the Community Foundation of Northwest Mississippi; was named Success Magazine’s “Pioneer of the New American Start-Up” in 1989; received the 1986 White House Conference on Small Business Award for Entrepreneurial Excellence and the 1984 Council of Fashion Designers of America award; Performance Magazine’s 1982 “Innovator of the Year” award for his work developing MTV and Billboard Magazine’s “Radio Program Manager of the Year” in 1977. In October 2012, he was awarded the Henry A. Grunwald Award for Public Service by Lighthouse International. He also received the American Academy of Achievement’s Golden Plate award; International Teleproduction Society’s Lifetime Achievement International Monitor Award and The President's Award and an Honorary Doctorate from Bank Street College of Education, the school's highest honor, for his many contributions to the advancement of education.
Personal life[edit]
Pittman married Sandy Hill, a merchandise editor at Mademoiselle, in July 1979; they divorced in 1997. They have one son. He married Veronique Choa in 1997. They have two children.
References[edit]


^ New York Times coverage of Robert W. Pittman
^ Smith, Ethan (October 3, 2011). "Pittman to Run Clear Channel". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ "Adweek" MTV Founder Bob Pittman Is Our First Media Visionary
^ "Cannes Lions TV" on YouTube
^ USA Today coverage of Robert W. Pittman
^ Marr, Merissa (October 15, 2012). "Pittman Envisions New Life for Radio". The Wall Street Journal. pp. B1, B4. Retrieved October 15, 2012. 
^ CNN coverage of Pittman
^ New York Times, op cit
^ Advertising Age, 10 Marketers Who Transformed American Culture
^ Businessweek coverage of Pittman's ventures
^ [1]
^ New York Times, op cit
^ Landman, Beth. "MTV Founder Bob Pittman Launches Tasting Table Today". New York Magazine. Retrieved 6 October 2008. 
^ Jason Del Rey (September 12, 2001). "Entrepreneurs in the News". Inc. 
^ Comcast Sets Deal to Buy Daily Candy
^ [2]
^ Wrap Staff (January 28, 2010). "Ipsos Buys Online Research Firm OTX". The Wrap. 
^ "Breaking News". USA Today. September 23, 2011. 
^ Warner, Charles (March 23, 2011). "Bob Pittman Is Just What Radio Needs". Huffington Post. 
^ [3]
^ Brian Costa (March 20, 2012). "Meet the Mets (Minority Owners): Bob Pittman, Kenneth Lerer". Wall Street Journal. 
^ "AOL's Bob Pittman to Receive Ripple of Hope Award; Mrs. Robert Kennedy to Present Award at New York Gala." U.S. Newswire. US Newswire. 2000. Retrieved September 22, 2009 from HighBeam Research: http://www.highbeam.com/doc/1P2-18885525.html








v
t
e


iHeartMedia



Corporate officers



Bob Pittman (Chairman/CEO)





Board of directors



Lowry Mays
Irving Azoff
B. J. "Red" McCombs
J. C. Watts
John H. Williams





Radio stations



List of radio stations owned by iHeartMedia





Radio networks



Fox Sports Radio
Premiere Networks
Premium Choice
Total Traffic and Weather Network





Miscellaneous



Clear Channel Outdoor
Clear Channel UK
iHeartRadio
List of programming syndicated by iHeartMedia
Mediabase
Radio Computing Services










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Robert_Pittman_(media_executive)&oldid=780799508"					
Categories: 1953 birthsLiving peopleAmerican businesspeopleAmerican business executivesAmerican television company foundersAmerican MethodistsAmerican philanthropistsPeople from Brookhaven, MississippiBusinesspeople from Jackson, MississippiAmerican corporate directorsAOL peopleMTV executivesIHeartMedia, Inc.Hidden categories: Articles with hCards 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 17 May 2017, at 07:48.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Robert Pittman (media executive) - Wikipedia






















 






Robert Pittman (media executive)

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Bob Pittman



Pittman on July 20, 2011



Born
Robert Warren Pittman
(1953-12-28) December 28, 1953 (age 63)
Jackson, Mississippi, US


Occupation
Businessman


Known for
MTV
iHeartMedia


Spouse(s)
Veronique Choa Pittman


Children
3


Robert Warren "Bob" Pittman (born December 28, 1953), is an American businessman. Currently Chairman and CEO of iHeartMedia, Inc. (formerly Clear Channel), a global media and entertainment company, Pittman led the team that created MTV (eventually becoming its President).[1] Pittman joined Clear Channel in November 2010 as an investor and the company’s Chairman of Media and Entertainment Platforms, was named CEO of iHeartMedia (formerly known as Clear Channel Communications)[2] in 2011 and was named Chairman in 2013. Clear Channel became iHeartMedia, Inc. in September 2014. Pittman has also been the CEO of MTV Networks, AOL, Six Flags Theme Parks, Quantum Media, Century 21 Real Estate and Time Warner Enterprises, and COO of America Online, Inc. and AOL Time Warner.
Pittman has also been a radio and TV programmer, marketer, investor and media entrepreneur who has had multiple careers in a number of consumer-focused industries. According to Sean Parker, Pittman is the only media mogul who’s genuinely an entrepreneur. In giving him its first-ever 'Media Visionary" award, advertising publication Adweek [3] referred to him as a "jack of all media" and former MTV executive Tom Freston referred to him as "the wonder boy of branding."
Recognized for his creativity and risk taking, Pittman stated in a Cannes Lions TV interview[4] with musician and Oscar-winning actor Jared Leto at the 2014 Cannes Lions International Festival of Creativity that “Someone told me early on when you are trying to solve a problem it’s the mix of math and magic. Understanding the problem, the analytical and then you need to have the creativity, you got to have the first of a magical ideal to solve the problem and I think that is what creativity is.”
In addition during a conversation with USA Today at the Festival Pittman also offered insights on how to bring about professional triumphs advising readers to “Have faith in gut feelings.”[5]



Contents


1 Biography

1.1 Early life
1.2 MTV Years
1.3 Quantum Media and Time Warner
1.4 Century 21 Real Estate
1.5 America Online and AOL Time Warner
1.6 Pilot Group
1.7 Clear Channel Media Holdings, Inc. and iHeartMedia, Inc.
1.8 Recent years
1.9 Awards and honors
1.10 Personal life


2 References



Biography[edit]
Early life[edit]
Son of a Methodist minister, Pittman was born in Jackson, Mississippi, but raised in Brookhaven and became a radio announcer at the age of 15 to earn money for flying lessons.[6] He was an announcer in a number of cities and then successfully programmed radio stations in Pittsburgh, Chicago and finally at the NBC flagship station, WNBC-AM, in New York when he was 23 years old. He also produced and co-hosted a music video and news show in 1978 that ran on NBC's O&O Television stations. He did learn to fly, and has been a pilot for almost 40 years: He now has over 6,000 flight hours; currently holds an Airline Transport Pilot's license for airplanes; and is rated for helicopters and 3 types of jets.
MTV Years[edit]
At MTV, he oversaw the creation and growth of MTV and the transition of Nickelodeon from a failing network geared to preschoolers to the highest rated channel aimed at older kids as well as overseeing the launches of VH-1 and Nick at Nite, and led the initial public offering for MTV Networks and its expansion into international markets.[7] Under Pittman's leadership, MTV became the first profitable cable network; then-Time Warner Co-Chairman and Co-Chief Executive Officer Steve Ross also noted that MTV became the most profitable basic cable network during Pittman's tenure there.[8] For his development of the MTV brand, Advertising Age selected Pittman in 2010 as one of the ten most influential marketers who transformed American Culture.[9]
Quantum Media and Time Warner[edit]
After MTV, Pittman founded Quantum Media with MCA (one of the company's ventures was the Morton Downey Jr. show, an early television shock talk show), and in 1989, he bought out MCA, sold the assets to Warner Communications and became senior advisor to Warner Communications CEO Steve Ross just as Warner was merging with Time Inc. to create Time Warner.[10] In 1990, Pittman was appointed President and CEO of Time Warner Enterprises, the new business group of Time Warner, and in 1991 became Chairman and CEO of Six Flags Theme Parks where his team oversaw the revitalization of the Six Flags brand, taking attendance from 17 million to 25 million using a “classic second-place strategy” with their “Bigger than Disneyland, closer to home” positioning of the brand.[11]
Century 21 Real Estate[edit]
After Pittman led a process that led to Time Warner selling a controlling interest in Six Flags to Boston Ventures in 1995, he left to join Century 21 Real Estate as CEO. Pittman and his team grew Century 21 Real Estate through a strategy which included brand-building and national marketing, a new franchise sales organization, and the early adoption of the Internet as a lead-generating tool.
America Online and AOL Time Warner[edit]
While at Century 21, Pittman met Steve Case and joined the board of directors of America Online, Inc.; he joined the company as president of AOL Networks in 1996 and later became President and COO of America Online Inc. While at AOL, Pittman led the operating team that moved AOL from 6 million members to over 30 million; took the company profitable; introduced mass market advertising as a revenue source; and continued the mission of making the Internet as easy for consumers to use as the telephone or television. The company’s most memorable ad of that time had the tagline “America Online: So easy to use, no wonder it’s number one”. After AOL merged with Time Warner in 2001, Pittman became the Co-COO (and eventually COO) of the combined AOL Time Warner before leaving the company in 2002.[12]
Pilot Group[edit]
Pittman joined a number of his longtime operating team colleagues when he co-founded Pilot Group LLC, a private investment firm based New York in 2003. Pilot and its individual operating partners continue to have controlling investments in Tasting Table,[13] a leading epicurean digital content company, The Casa Dragones Tequila Company,[14] and Pure Wow, a digital content company targeted to the accomplished female audience.
Pilot Group previously owned and sold investments including Thrillist, which recently sold stakes to Axel Springer and Oak Capital); DailyCandy, sold to Comcast Ventures for a reported $125 million;[15][16] IdealBite, which was sold to the Walt Disney Company; and entertainment research company OTX (sold to Ipsos America).[17] Pilot also owned and sold significant minority investments in David's Bridal and Nutrisystem, and owned and sold the Barrington Broadcasting television group to Sinclair Broadcast Group in 2013 for $370 million and its radio station group Double O Radio to a variety of regional radio station groups including Town Square Media. Pilot and Pittman have also held various minority positions in digital content and technology venture companies including social gaming company Zynga, in which Pilot was an early investor; Huffington Post and Facebook.
Clear Channel Media Holdings, Inc. and iHeartMedia, Inc.[edit]
In November 2010, Pittman took on the role of Chairman of Media and Entertainment Platforms for Clear Channel and made a personal equity investment in the Company. In this role, Pittman worked to leverage the Company's media assets and spearhead the further development of a digital strategy for Clear Channel Radio, particularly with regard to its iHeartRadio digital radio platform, and today, iHeartMedia, Inc. is a multi-platform media and entertainment leader, with assets across broadcast radio; digital; mobile; social; outdoor; data; and live events. Pittman played a pivotal role in developing the iHeartRadio Music Festival, the biggest live concert festival in radio history, the first of which took place in Las Vegas on September 23–24, 2011 in conjunction with the launch of the New iHeartRadio.[18] The company has since expanded its national tentpole live events platform to include the nationally televised iHeartRadio Music Awards; the iHeartRadio Country Festival; iHeartRadio Fiesta Latina; the iHeartRadio Summer Pool Party; and the iHeartRadio Jingle Ball Tour. In December 2016, the company launched its two new on demand subscription platforms, iHeartRadio Plus and iHeartRadio All Access.
Following the transformation of the company in September 2014 to iHeartMedia, Inc. to better reflect the company's multi-platform focus, Bob Pittman became Chairman and CEO of iHeartMedia, Inc. and Chairman and CEO of Clear Channel Outdoor Holdings (after originally serving as Chairman of Clear Channel Media and Entertainment Platforms from November 2010 – October 2011). In this role, Pittman oversees all of the company's global media properties.
In conjunction with this position, Pittman also maintains his role as Founding Member of Pilot Group and continues his activities as a venture investor; in an indication of his continued interest in emerging technologies and businesses, he also serves on the board of live social video company Airtime. With his return to radio, Huffington Post’s media business expert Charles Warner dubbed him “best radio programmer ever”[19] and in 2011 he was ranked by Radio Ink magazine as the "Most Powerful Man in Radio." "Never before has anyone taken the number one slot on the list in their inaugural year," stated Radio Ink Publisher/CEO B. Eric Rhoads.[20] Pittman retained that designation in 2012, 2013 and 2014.
Recent years[edit]
Pittman is a philanthropist, building community and philanthropic projects into businesses he managed from Live Aid at MTV to educational efforts using the Internet at AOL. He is former chairman of the non-profit Robin Hood Foundation, which fights poverty in New York City, and still serves on the board; and is former chairman of the New York Public Theater. He is also on the boards of the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame and the Lupus Research Alliance. He is a former board member of the non-profit New York City Ballet as well as Electronic Arts, Atari Games, Excite, 3DO, MTV Networks, America Online, HFS/Cendant/Realogy, NYU Medical Center, and AOL Time Warner.
Pittman is one of the minority owners of the New York Mets, holding a 4% stake in the baseball team.[21]
Awards and honors[edit]
Pittman's many honors include: Robert F. Kennedy Memorial’s 2000 “Ripple of Hope Award”[22] for his commitment to civic and community affairs and his contributions to the advancement of education; induction into the Advertising Hall of Fame and the Broadcasting and Cable Hall of Fame; received AdWeek's first Media Visionary award in 2013 and Cablevision Magazine's "20/20 Vision" award for the 20 people who have had the greatest impact on the cable industry; selection as one of Advertising Age's "10 Marketers Who Changed American Culture” and "50 Pioneers and Visionaries of TV" and recognition as one of Business Week magazine's Top 25 Executives of 1998. He was also named one of Life Magazine's "Five Original Thinkers of the '80s"; recognized as the eighth of Life Magazine's "50 Most Influential Boomers"; included in Time Magazine's 1984 Man-of-the-Year issue "Seven Others who Succeeded"; received the "Star of Hope Award” in January 2014 from the Community Foundation of Northwest Mississippi; was named Success Magazine’s “Pioneer of the New American Start-Up” in 1989; received the 1986 White House Conference on Small Business Award for Entrepreneurial Excellence and the 1984 Council of Fashion Designers of America award; Performance Magazine’s 1982 “Innovator of the Year” award for his work developing MTV and Billboard Magazine’s “Radio Program Manager of the Year” in 1977. In October 2012, he was awarded the Henry A. Grunwald Award for Public Service by Lighthouse International. He also received the American Academy of Achievement’s Golden Plate award; International Teleproduction Society’s Lifetime Achievement International Monitor Award and The President's Award and an Honorary Doctorate from Bank Street College of Education, the school's highest honor, for his many contributions to the advancement of education.
Personal life[edit]
Pittman married Sandy Hill, a merchandise editor at Mademoiselle, in July 1979; they divorced in 1997. They have one son. He married Veronique Choa in 1997. They have two children.
References[edit]


^ New York Times coverage of Robert W. Pittman
^ Smith, Ethan (October 3, 2011). "Pittman to Run Clear Channel". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ "Adweek" MTV Founder Bob Pittman Is Our First Media Visionary
^ "Cannes Lions TV" on YouTube
^ USA Today coverage of Robert W. Pittman
^ Marr, Merissa (October 15, 2012). "Pittman Envisions New Life for Radio". The Wall Street Journal. pp. B1, B4. Retrieved October 15, 2012. 
^ CNN coverage of Pittman
^ New York Times, op cit
^ Advertising Age, 10 Marketers Who Transformed American Culture
^ Businessweek coverage of Pittman's ventures
^ [1]
^ New York Times, op cit
^ Landman, Beth. "MTV Founder Bob Pittman Launches Tasting Table Today". New York Magazine. Retrieved 6 October 2008. 
^ Jason Del Rey (September 12, 2001). "Entrepreneurs in the News". Inc. 
^ Comcast Sets Deal to Buy Daily Candy
^ [2]
^ Wrap Staff (January 28, 2010). "Ipsos Buys Online Research Firm OTX". The Wrap. 
^ "Breaking News". USA Today. September 23, 2011. 
^ Warner, Charles (March 23, 2011). "Bob Pittman Is Just What Radio Needs". Huffington Post. 
^ [3]
^ Brian Costa (March 20, 2012). "Meet the Mets (Minority Owners): Bob Pittman, Kenneth Lerer". Wall Street Journal. 
^ "AOL's Bob Pittman to Receive Ripple of Hope Award; Mrs. Robert Kennedy to Present Award at New York Gala." U.S. Newswire. US Newswire. 2000. Retrieved September 22, 2009 from HighBeam Research: http://www.highbeam.com/doc/1P2-18885525.html








v
t
e


iHeartMedia



Corporate officers



Bob Pittman (Chairman/CEO)





Board of directors



Lowry Mays
Irving Azoff
B. J. "Red" McCombs
J. C. Watts
John H. Williams





Radio stations



List of radio stations owned by iHeartMedia





Radio networks



Fox Sports Radio
Premiere Networks
Premium Choice
Total Traffic and Weather Network





Miscellaneous



Clear Channel Outdoor
Clear Channel UK
iHeartRadio
List of programming syndicated by iHeartMedia
Mediabase
Radio Computing Services










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Robert_Pittman_(media_executive)&oldid=780799508"					
Categories: 1953 birthsLiving peopleAmerican businesspeopleAmerican business executivesAmerican television company foundersAmerican MethodistsAmerican philanthropistsPeople from Brookhaven, MississippiBusinesspeople from Jackson, MississippiAmerican corporate directorsAOL peopleMTV executivesIHeartMedia, Inc.Hidden categories: Articles with hCards 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 17 May 2017, at 07:48.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 










Creative Commons — Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported
— CC BY-SA 3.0 






















Skip to content








 Menu















Help us build a vibrant, collaborative global commons
Donate Now














Creative Commons


Creative Commons License Deed







Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported

(CC BY-SA 3.0)








This is a human-readable summary of (and not a substitute for) the license.


Disclaimer.






You are free to:


Share — copy and redistribute the material in any medium or format


Adapt — remix, transform, and build upon the material


for any purpose, even commercially.

















The licensor cannot revoke these freedoms as long as you follow the license terms.




Under the following terms:



Attribution — You must give appropriate credit, provide a link to the license, and indicate if changes were made. You may do so in any reasonable manner, but not in any way that suggests the licensor endorses you or your use.




Attribute this work:












ShareAlike — If you remix, transform, or build upon the material, you must distribute your contributions under the same license as the original.








No additional restrictions — You may not apply legal terms or technological measures that legally restrict others from doing anything the license permits.






Notices:



You do not have to comply with the license for elements of the material in the public domain or where your use is permitted by an applicable exception or limitation.


No warranties are given. The license may not give you all of the permissions necessary for your intended use. For example, other rights such as publicity, privacy, or moral rights may limit how you use the material.








Learn more about CC licensing, or use the license for your own material.






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
Make a Donation






This page is available in the following languages:


Castellano
Castellano (España)
Català
Dansk
Deutsch
English
Esperanto
français
Galego
hrvatski
Indonesia
Italiano
Latviski
Lietuvių
Melayu
Nederlands
Norsk
polski
Português
Português (BR)
română
Slovenščina
Suomeksi
svenska
Türkçe
íslenska
česky
Ελληνικά
Беларуская
русский
українська
العربية
پارسی
中文
日本語
華語 (台灣)
한국어






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
When you share, everyone wins.





Contribute today to Creative Commons




$100



$50



$25



$5































Disclaimer

This deed highlights only some of the key features and terms of the actual license. It is not a license and has no legal value. You should carefully review all of the terms and conditions of the actual license before using the licensed material.
Creative Commons is not a law firm and does not provide legal services. Distributing, displaying, or linking to this deed or the license that it summarizes does not create a lawyer-client or any other relationship.




What does "Attribute this work" mean?


The page you came from contained embedded licensing metadata, including how the creator wishes to be attributed for re-use. You can use the HTML here to cite the work. Doing so will also include metadata on your page so that others can find the original work as well.




The applicable mediation rules will be designated in the copyright notice published with the work, or if none then in the request for mediation. Unless otherwise designated in a copyright notice attached to the work, the UNCITRAL Arbitration Rules apply to any arbitration.
More info.




If supplied, you must provide the name of the creator and attribution parties, a copyright notice, a license notice, a disclaimer notice, and a link to the material. CC licenses prior to Version 4.0 also require you to provide the title of the material if supplied, and may have other slight differences.
More info.




In 4.0, you must indicate if you modified the material and retain an indication of previous modifications. In 3.0 and earlier license versions, the indication of changes is only required if you create a derivative.
Marking guide.
More info.




You may also use a license listed as compatible at https://creativecommons.org/compatiblelicenses
More info.




A commercial use is one primarily intended for commercial advantage or monetary compensation.
More info.




Merely changing the format never creates a derivative.
More info.




The license prohibits application of effective technological measures, defined with reference to Article 11 of the WIPO Copyright Treaty.
More info.




The rights of users under exceptions and limitations, such as fair use and fair dealing, are not affected by the CC licenses.
More info.




You may need to get additional permissions before using the material as you intend.
More info.























Robert Pittman (media executive) - Wikipedia






















 






Robert Pittman (media executive)

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Bob Pittman



Pittman on July 20, 2011



Born
Robert Warren Pittman
(1953-12-28) December 28, 1953 (age 63)
Jackson, Mississippi, US


Occupation
Businessman


Known for
MTV
iHeartMedia


Spouse(s)
Veronique Choa Pittman


Children
3


Robert Warren "Bob" Pittman (born December 28, 1953), is an American businessman. Currently Chairman and CEO of iHeartMedia, Inc. (formerly Clear Channel), a global media and entertainment company, Pittman led the team that created MTV (eventually becoming its President).[1] Pittman joined Clear Channel in November 2010 as an investor and the company’s Chairman of Media and Entertainment Platforms, was named CEO of iHeartMedia (formerly known as Clear Channel Communications)[2] in 2011 and was named Chairman in 2013. Clear Channel became iHeartMedia, Inc. in September 2014. Pittman has also been the CEO of MTV Networks, AOL, Six Flags Theme Parks, Quantum Media, Century 21 Real Estate and Time Warner Enterprises, and COO of America Online, Inc. and AOL Time Warner.
Pittman has also been a radio and TV programmer, marketer, investor and media entrepreneur who has had multiple careers in a number of consumer-focused industries. According to Sean Parker, Pittman is the only media mogul who’s genuinely an entrepreneur. In giving him its first-ever 'Media Visionary" award, advertising publication Adweek [3] referred to him as a "jack of all media" and former MTV executive Tom Freston referred to him as "the wonder boy of branding."
Recognized for his creativity and risk taking, Pittman stated in a Cannes Lions TV interview[4] with musician and Oscar-winning actor Jared Leto at the 2014 Cannes Lions International Festival of Creativity that “Someone told me early on when you are trying to solve a problem it’s the mix of math and magic. Understanding the problem, the analytical and then you need to have the creativity, you got to have the first of a magical ideal to solve the problem and I think that is what creativity is.”
In addition during a conversation with USA Today at the Festival Pittman also offered insights on how to bring about professional triumphs advising readers to “Have faith in gut feelings.”[5]



Contents


1 Biography

1.1 Early life
1.2 MTV Years
1.3 Quantum Media and Time Warner
1.4 Century 21 Real Estate
1.5 America Online and AOL Time Warner
1.6 Pilot Group
1.7 Clear Channel Media Holdings, Inc. and iHeartMedia, Inc.
1.8 Recent years
1.9 Awards and honors
1.10 Personal life


2 References



Biography[edit]
Early life[edit]
Son of a Methodist minister, Pittman was born in Jackson, Mississippi, but raised in Brookhaven and became a radio announcer at the age of 15 to earn money for flying lessons.[6] He was an announcer in a number of cities and then successfully programmed radio stations in Pittsburgh, Chicago and finally at the NBC flagship station, WNBC-AM, in New York when he was 23 years old. He also produced and co-hosted a music video and news show in 1978 that ran on NBC's O&O Television stations. He did learn to fly, and has been a pilot for almost 40 years: He now has over 6,000 flight hours; currently holds an Airline Transport Pilot's license for airplanes; and is rated for helicopters and 3 types of jets.
MTV Years[edit]
At MTV, he oversaw the creation and growth of MTV and the transition of Nickelodeon from a failing network geared to preschoolers to the highest rated channel aimed at older kids as well as overseeing the launches of VH-1 and Nick at Nite, and led the initial public offering for MTV Networks and its expansion into international markets.[7] Under Pittman's leadership, MTV became the first profitable cable network; then-Time Warner Co-Chairman and Co-Chief Executive Officer Steve Ross also noted that MTV became the most profitable basic cable network during Pittman's tenure there.[8] For his development of the MTV brand, Advertising Age selected Pittman in 2010 as one of the ten most influential marketers who transformed American Culture.[9]
Quantum Media and Time Warner[edit]
After MTV, Pittman founded Quantum Media with MCA (one of the company's ventures was the Morton Downey Jr. show, an early television shock talk show), and in 1989, he bought out MCA, sold the assets to Warner Communications and became senior advisor to Warner Communications CEO Steve Ross just as Warner was merging with Time Inc. to create Time Warner.[10] In 1990, Pittman was appointed President and CEO of Time Warner Enterprises, the new business group of Time Warner, and in 1991 became Chairman and CEO of Six Flags Theme Parks where his team oversaw the revitalization of the Six Flags brand, taking attendance from 17 million to 25 million using a “classic second-place strategy” with their “Bigger than Disneyland, closer to home” positioning of the brand.[11]
Century 21 Real Estate[edit]
After Pittman led a process that led to Time Warner selling a controlling interest in Six Flags to Boston Ventures in 1995, he left to join Century 21 Real Estate as CEO. Pittman and his team grew Century 21 Real Estate through a strategy which included brand-building and national marketing, a new franchise sales organization, and the early adoption of the Internet as a lead-generating tool.
America Online and AOL Time Warner[edit]
While at Century 21, Pittman met Steve Case and joined the board of directors of America Online, Inc.; he joined the company as president of AOL Networks in 1996 and later became President and COO of America Online Inc. While at AOL, Pittman led the operating team that moved AOL from 6 million members to over 30 million; took the company profitable; introduced mass market advertising as a revenue source; and continued the mission of making the Internet as easy for consumers to use as the telephone or television. The company’s most memorable ad of that time had the tagline “America Online: So easy to use, no wonder it’s number one”. After AOL merged with Time Warner in 2001, Pittman became the Co-COO (and eventually COO) of the combined AOL Time Warner before leaving the company in 2002.[12]
Pilot Group[edit]
Pittman joined a number of his longtime operating team colleagues when he co-founded Pilot Group LLC, a private investment firm based New York in 2003. Pilot and its individual operating partners continue to have controlling investments in Tasting Table,[13] a leading epicurean digital content company, The Casa Dragones Tequila Company,[14] and Pure Wow, a digital content company targeted to the accomplished female audience.
Pilot Group previously owned and sold investments including Thrillist, which recently sold stakes to Axel Springer and Oak Capital); DailyCandy, sold to Comcast Ventures for a reported $125 million;[15][16] IdealBite, which was sold to the Walt Disney Company; and entertainment research company OTX (sold to Ipsos America).[17] Pilot also owned and sold significant minority investments in David's Bridal and Nutrisystem, and owned and sold the Barrington Broadcasting television group to Sinclair Broadcast Group in 2013 for $370 million and its radio station group Double O Radio to a variety of regional radio station groups including Town Square Media. Pilot and Pittman have also held various minority positions in digital content and technology venture companies including social gaming company Zynga, in which Pilot was an early investor; Huffington Post and Facebook.
Clear Channel Media Holdings, Inc. and iHeartMedia, Inc.[edit]
In November 2010, Pittman took on the role of Chairman of Media and Entertainment Platforms for Clear Channel and made a personal equity investment in the Company. In this role, Pittman worked to leverage the Company's media assets and spearhead the further development of a digital strategy for Clear Channel Radio, particularly with regard to its iHeartRadio digital radio platform, and today, iHeartMedia, Inc. is a multi-platform media and entertainment leader, with assets across broadcast radio; digital; mobile; social; outdoor; data; and live events. Pittman played a pivotal role in developing the iHeartRadio Music Festival, the biggest live concert festival in radio history, the first of which took place in Las Vegas on September 23–24, 2011 in conjunction with the launch of the New iHeartRadio.[18] The company has since expanded its national tentpole live events platform to include the nationally televised iHeartRadio Music Awards; the iHeartRadio Country Festival; iHeartRadio Fiesta Latina; the iHeartRadio Summer Pool Party; and the iHeartRadio Jingle Ball Tour. In December 2016, the company launched its two new on demand subscription platforms, iHeartRadio Plus and iHeartRadio All Access.
Following the transformation of the company in September 2014 to iHeartMedia, Inc. to better reflect the company's multi-platform focus, Bob Pittman became Chairman and CEO of iHeartMedia, Inc. and Chairman and CEO of Clear Channel Outdoor Holdings (after originally serving as Chairman of Clear Channel Media and Entertainment Platforms from November 2010 – October 2011). In this role, Pittman oversees all of the company's global media properties.
In conjunction with this position, Pittman also maintains his role as Founding Member of Pilot Group and continues his activities as a venture investor; in an indication of his continued interest in emerging technologies and businesses, he also serves on the board of live social video company Airtime. With his return to radio, Huffington Post’s media business expert Charles Warner dubbed him “best radio programmer ever”[19] and in 2011 he was ranked by Radio Ink magazine as the "Most Powerful Man in Radio." "Never before has anyone taken the number one slot on the list in their inaugural year," stated Radio Ink Publisher/CEO B. Eric Rhoads.[20] Pittman retained that designation in 2012, 2013 and 2014.
Recent years[edit]
Pittman is a philanthropist, building community and philanthropic projects into businesses he managed from Live Aid at MTV to educational efforts using the Internet at AOL. He is former chairman of the non-profit Robin Hood Foundation, which fights poverty in New York City, and still serves on the board; and is former chairman of the New York Public Theater. He is also on the boards of the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame and the Lupus Research Alliance. He is a former board member of the non-profit New York City Ballet as well as Electronic Arts, Atari Games, Excite, 3DO, MTV Networks, America Online, HFS/Cendant/Realogy, NYU Medical Center, and AOL Time Warner.
Pittman is one of the minority owners of the New York Mets, holding a 4% stake in the baseball team.[21]
Awards and honors[edit]
Pittman's many honors include: Robert F. Kennedy Memorial’s 2000 “Ripple of Hope Award”[22] for his commitment to civic and community affairs and his contributions to the advancement of education; induction into the Advertising Hall of Fame and the Broadcasting and Cable Hall of Fame; received AdWeek's first Media Visionary award in 2013 and Cablevision Magazine's "20/20 Vision" award for the 20 people who have had the greatest impact on the cable industry; selection as one of Advertising Age's "10 Marketers Who Changed American Culture” and "50 Pioneers and Visionaries of TV" and recognition as one of Business Week magazine's Top 25 Executives of 1998. He was also named one of Life Magazine's "Five Original Thinkers of the '80s"; recognized as the eighth of Life Magazine's "50 Most Influential Boomers"; included in Time Magazine's 1984 Man-of-the-Year issue "Seven Others who Succeeded"; received the "Star of Hope Award” in January 2014 from the Community Foundation of Northwest Mississippi; was named Success Magazine’s “Pioneer of the New American Start-Up” in 1989; received the 1986 White House Conference on Small Business Award for Entrepreneurial Excellence and the 1984 Council of Fashion Designers of America award; Performance Magazine’s 1982 “Innovator of the Year” award for his work developing MTV and Billboard Magazine’s “Radio Program Manager of the Year” in 1977. In October 2012, he was awarded the Henry A. Grunwald Award for Public Service by Lighthouse International. He also received the American Academy of Achievement’s Golden Plate award; International Teleproduction Society’s Lifetime Achievement International Monitor Award and The President's Award and an Honorary Doctorate from Bank Street College of Education, the school's highest honor, for his many contributions to the advancement of education.
Personal life[edit]
Pittman married Sandy Hill, a merchandise editor at Mademoiselle, in July 1979; they divorced in 1997. They have one son. He married Veronique Choa in 1997. They have two children.
References[edit]


^ New York Times coverage of Robert W. Pittman
^ Smith, Ethan (October 3, 2011). "Pittman to Run Clear Channel". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ "Adweek" MTV Founder Bob Pittman Is Our First Media Visionary
^ "Cannes Lions TV" on YouTube
^ USA Today coverage of Robert W. Pittman
^ Marr, Merissa (October 15, 2012). "Pittman Envisions New Life for Radio". The Wall Street Journal. pp. B1, B4. Retrieved October 15, 2012. 
^ CNN coverage of Pittman
^ New York Times, op cit
^ Advertising Age, 10 Marketers Who Transformed American Culture
^ Businessweek coverage of Pittman's ventures
^ [1]
^ New York Times, op cit
^ Landman, Beth. "MTV Founder Bob Pittman Launches Tasting Table Today". New York Magazine. Retrieved 6 October 2008. 
^ Jason Del Rey (September 12, 2001). "Entrepreneurs in the News". Inc. 
^ Comcast Sets Deal to Buy Daily Candy
^ [2]
^ Wrap Staff (January 28, 2010). "Ipsos Buys Online Research Firm OTX". The Wrap. 
^ "Breaking News". USA Today. September 23, 2011. 
^ Warner, Charles (March 23, 2011). "Bob Pittman Is Just What Radio Needs". Huffington Post. 
^ [3]
^ Brian Costa (March 20, 2012). "Meet the Mets (Minority Owners): Bob Pittman, Kenneth Lerer". Wall Street Journal. 
^ "AOL's Bob Pittman to Receive Ripple of Hope Award; Mrs. Robert Kennedy to Present Award at New York Gala." U.S. Newswire. US Newswire. 2000. Retrieved September 22, 2009 from HighBeam Research: http://www.highbeam.com/doc/1P2-18885525.html








v
t
e


iHeartMedia



Corporate officers



Bob Pittman (Chairman/CEO)





Board of directors



Lowry Mays
Irving Azoff
B. J. "Red" McCombs
J. C. Watts
John H. Williams





Radio stations



List of radio stations owned by iHeartMedia





Radio networks



Fox Sports Radio
Premiere Networks
Premium Choice
Total Traffic and Weather Network





Miscellaneous



Clear Channel Outdoor
Clear Channel UK
iHeartRadio
List of programming syndicated by iHeartMedia
Mediabase
Radio Computing Services










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Robert_Pittman_(media_executive)&oldid=780799508"					
Categories: 1953 birthsLiving peopleAmerican businesspeopleAmerican business executivesAmerican television company foundersAmerican MethodistsAmerican philanthropistsPeople from Brookhaven, MississippiBusinesspeople from Jackson, MississippiAmerican corporate directorsAOL peopleMTV executivesIHeartMedia, Inc.Hidden categories: Articles with hCards 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 17 May 2017, at 07:48.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Robert Pittman (media executive) - Wikipedia






















 






Robert Pittman (media executive)

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Bob Pittman



Pittman on July 20, 2011



Born
Robert Warren Pittman
(1953-12-28) December 28, 1953 (age 63)
Jackson, Mississippi, US


Occupation
Businessman


Known for
MTV
iHeartMedia


Spouse(s)
Veronique Choa Pittman


Children
3


Robert Warren "Bob" Pittman (born December 28, 1953), is an American businessman. Currently Chairman and CEO of iHeartMedia, Inc. (formerly Clear Channel), a global media and entertainment company, Pittman led the team that created MTV (eventually becoming its President).[1] Pittman joined Clear Channel in November 2010 as an investor and the company’s Chairman of Media and Entertainment Platforms, was named CEO of iHeartMedia (formerly known as Clear Channel Communications)[2] in 2011 and was named Chairman in 2013. Clear Channel became iHeartMedia, Inc. in September 2014. Pittman has also been the CEO of MTV Networks, AOL, Six Flags Theme Parks, Quantum Media, Century 21 Real Estate and Time Warner Enterprises, and COO of America Online, Inc. and AOL Time Warner.
Pittman has also been a radio and TV programmer, marketer, investor and media entrepreneur who has had multiple careers in a number of consumer-focused industries. According to Sean Parker, Pittman is the only media mogul who’s genuinely an entrepreneur. In giving him its first-ever 'Media Visionary" award, advertising publication Adweek [3] referred to him as a "jack of all media" and former MTV executive Tom Freston referred to him as "the wonder boy of branding."
Recognized for his creativity and risk taking, Pittman stated in a Cannes Lions TV interview[4] with musician and Oscar-winning actor Jared Leto at the 2014 Cannes Lions International Festival of Creativity that “Someone told me early on when you are trying to solve a problem it’s the mix of math and magic. Understanding the problem, the analytical and then you need to have the creativity, you got to have the first of a magical ideal to solve the problem and I think that is what creativity is.”
In addition during a conversation with USA Today at the Festival Pittman also offered insights on how to bring about professional triumphs advising readers to “Have faith in gut feelings.”[5]



Contents


1 Biography

1.1 Early life
1.2 MTV Years
1.3 Quantum Media and Time Warner
1.4 Century 21 Real Estate
1.5 America Online and AOL Time Warner
1.6 Pilot Group
1.7 Clear Channel Media Holdings, Inc. and iHeartMedia, Inc.
1.8 Recent years
1.9 Awards and honors
1.10 Personal life


2 References



Biography[edit]
Early life[edit]
Son of a Methodist minister, Pittman was born in Jackson, Mississippi, but raised in Brookhaven and became a radio announcer at the age of 15 to earn money for flying lessons.[6] He was an announcer in a number of cities and then successfully programmed radio stations in Pittsburgh, Chicago and finally at the NBC flagship station, WNBC-AM, in New York when he was 23 years old. He also produced and co-hosted a music video and news show in 1978 that ran on NBC's O&O Television stations. He did learn to fly, and has been a pilot for almost 40 years: He now has over 6,000 flight hours; currently holds an Airline Transport Pilot's license for airplanes; and is rated for helicopters and 3 types of jets.
MTV Years[edit]
At MTV, he oversaw the creation and growth of MTV and the transition of Nickelodeon from a failing network geared to preschoolers to the highest rated channel aimed at older kids as well as overseeing the launches of VH-1 and Nick at Nite, and led the initial public offering for MTV Networks and its expansion into international markets.[7] Under Pittman's leadership, MTV became the first profitable cable network; then-Time Warner Co-Chairman and Co-Chief Executive Officer Steve Ross also noted that MTV became the most profitable basic cable network during Pittman's tenure there.[8] For his development of the MTV brand, Advertising Age selected Pittman in 2010 as one of the ten most influential marketers who transformed American Culture.[9]
Quantum Media and Time Warner[edit]
After MTV, Pittman founded Quantum Media with MCA (one of the company's ventures was the Morton Downey Jr. show, an early television shock talk show), and in 1989, he bought out MCA, sold the assets to Warner Communications and became senior advisor to Warner Communications CEO Steve Ross just as Warner was merging with Time Inc. to create Time Warner.[10] In 1990, Pittman was appointed President and CEO of Time Warner Enterprises, the new business group of Time Warner, and in 1991 became Chairman and CEO of Six Flags Theme Parks where his team oversaw the revitalization of the Six Flags brand, taking attendance from 17 million to 25 million using a “classic second-place strategy” with their “Bigger than Disneyland, closer to home” positioning of the brand.[11]
Century 21 Real Estate[edit]
After Pittman led a process that led to Time Warner selling a controlling interest in Six Flags to Boston Ventures in 1995, he left to join Century 21 Real Estate as CEO. Pittman and his team grew Century 21 Real Estate through a strategy which included brand-building and national marketing, a new franchise sales organization, and the early adoption of the Internet as a lead-generating tool.
America Online and AOL Time Warner[edit]
While at Century 21, Pittman met Steve Case and joined the board of directors of America Online, Inc.; he joined the company as president of AOL Networks in 1996 and later became President and COO of America Online Inc. While at AOL, Pittman led the operating team that moved AOL from 6 million members to over 30 million; took the company profitable; introduced mass market advertising as a revenue source; and continued the mission of making the Internet as easy for consumers to use as the telephone or television. The company’s most memorable ad of that time had the tagline “America Online: So easy to use, no wonder it’s number one”. After AOL merged with Time Warner in 2001, Pittman became the Co-COO (and eventually COO) of the combined AOL Time Warner before leaving the company in 2002.[12]
Pilot Group[edit]
Pittman joined a number of his longtime operating team colleagues when he co-founded Pilot Group LLC, a private investment firm based New York in 2003. Pilot and its individual operating partners continue to have controlling investments in Tasting Table,[13] a leading epicurean digital content company, The Casa Dragones Tequila Company,[14] and Pure Wow, a digital content company targeted to the accomplished female audience.
Pilot Group previously owned and sold investments including Thrillist, which recently sold stakes to Axel Springer and Oak Capital); DailyCandy, sold to Comcast Ventures for a reported $125 million;[15][16] IdealBite, which was sold to the Walt Disney Company; and entertainment research company OTX (sold to Ipsos America).[17] Pilot also owned and sold significant minority investments in David's Bridal and Nutrisystem, and owned and sold the Barrington Broadcasting television group to Sinclair Broadcast Group in 2013 for $370 million and its radio station group Double O Radio to a variety of regional radio station groups including Town Square Media. Pilot and Pittman have also held various minority positions in digital content and technology venture companies including social gaming company Zynga, in which Pilot was an early investor; Huffington Post and Facebook.
Clear Channel Media Holdings, Inc. and iHeartMedia, Inc.[edit]
In November 2010, Pittman took on the role of Chairman of Media and Entertainment Platforms for Clear Channel and made a personal equity investment in the Company. In this role, Pittman worked to leverage the Company's media assets and spearhead the further development of a digital strategy for Clear Channel Radio, particularly with regard to its iHeartRadio digital radio platform, and today, iHeartMedia, Inc. is a multi-platform media and entertainment leader, with assets across broadcast radio; digital; mobile; social; outdoor; data; and live events. Pittman played a pivotal role in developing the iHeartRadio Music Festival, the biggest live concert festival in radio history, the first of which took place in Las Vegas on September 23–24, 2011 in conjunction with the launch of the New iHeartRadio.[18] The company has since expanded its national tentpole live events platform to include the nationally televised iHeartRadio Music Awards; the iHeartRadio Country Festival; iHeartRadio Fiesta Latina; the iHeartRadio Summer Pool Party; and the iHeartRadio Jingle Ball Tour. In December 2016, the company launched its two new on demand subscription platforms, iHeartRadio Plus and iHeartRadio All Access.
Following the transformation of the company in September 2014 to iHeartMedia, Inc. to better reflect the company's multi-platform focus, Bob Pittman became Chairman and CEO of iHeartMedia, Inc. and Chairman and CEO of Clear Channel Outdoor Holdings (after originally serving as Chairman of Clear Channel Media and Entertainment Platforms from November 2010 – October 2011). In this role, Pittman oversees all of the company's global media properties.
In conjunction with this position, Pittman also maintains his role as Founding Member of Pilot Group and continues his activities as a venture investor; in an indication of his continued interest in emerging technologies and businesses, he also serves on the board of live social video company Airtime. With his return to radio, Huffington Post’s media business expert Charles Warner dubbed him “best radio programmer ever”[19] and in 2011 he was ranked by Radio Ink magazine as the "Most Powerful Man in Radio." "Never before has anyone taken the number one slot on the list in their inaugural year," stated Radio Ink Publisher/CEO B. Eric Rhoads.[20] Pittman retained that designation in 2012, 2013 and 2014.
Recent years[edit]
Pittman is a philanthropist, building community and philanthropic projects into businesses he managed from Live Aid at MTV to educational efforts using the Internet at AOL. He is former chairman of the non-profit Robin Hood Foundation, which fights poverty in New York City, and still serves on the board; and is former chairman of the New York Public Theater. He is also on the boards of the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame and the Lupus Research Alliance. He is a former board member of the non-profit New York City Ballet as well as Electronic Arts, Atari Games, Excite, 3DO, MTV Networks, America Online, HFS/Cendant/Realogy, NYU Medical Center, and AOL Time Warner.
Pittman is one of the minority owners of the New York Mets, holding a 4% stake in the baseball team.[21]
Awards and honors[edit]
Pittman's many honors include: Robert F. Kennedy Memorial’s 2000 “Ripple of Hope Award”[22] for his commitment to civic and community affairs and his contributions to the advancement of education; induction into the Advertising Hall of Fame and the Broadcasting and Cable Hall of Fame; received AdWeek's first Media Visionary award in 2013 and Cablevision Magazine's "20/20 Vision" award for the 20 people who have had the greatest impact on the cable industry; selection as one of Advertising Age's "10 Marketers Who Changed American Culture” and "50 Pioneers and Visionaries of TV" and recognition as one of Business Week magazine's Top 25 Executives of 1998. He was also named one of Life Magazine's "Five Original Thinkers of the '80s"; recognized as the eighth of Life Magazine's "50 Most Influential Boomers"; included in Time Magazine's 1984 Man-of-the-Year issue "Seven Others who Succeeded"; received the "Star of Hope Award” in January 2014 from the Community Foundation of Northwest Mississippi; was named Success Magazine’s “Pioneer of the New American Start-Up” in 1989; received the 1986 White House Conference on Small Business Award for Entrepreneurial Excellence and the 1984 Council of Fashion Designers of America award; Performance Magazine’s 1982 “Innovator of the Year” award for his work developing MTV and Billboard Magazine’s “Radio Program Manager of the Year” in 1977. In October 2012, he was awarded the Henry A. Grunwald Award for Public Service by Lighthouse International. He also received the American Academy of Achievement’s Golden Plate award; International Teleproduction Society’s Lifetime Achievement International Monitor Award and The President's Award and an Honorary Doctorate from Bank Street College of Education, the school's highest honor, for his many contributions to the advancement of education.
Personal life[edit]
Pittman married Sandy Hill, a merchandise editor at Mademoiselle, in July 1979; they divorced in 1997. They have one son. He married Veronique Choa in 1997. They have two children.
References[edit]


^ New York Times coverage of Robert W. Pittman
^ Smith, Ethan (October 3, 2011). "Pittman to Run Clear Channel". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ "Adweek" MTV Founder Bob Pittman Is Our First Media Visionary
^ "Cannes Lions TV" on YouTube
^ USA Today coverage of Robert W. Pittman
^ Marr, Merissa (October 15, 2012). "Pittman Envisions New Life for Radio". The Wall Street Journal. pp. B1, B4. Retrieved October 15, 2012. 
^ CNN coverage of Pittman
^ New York Times, op cit
^ Advertising Age, 10 Marketers Who Transformed American Culture
^ Businessweek coverage of Pittman's ventures
^ [1]
^ New York Times, op cit
^ Landman, Beth. "MTV Founder Bob Pittman Launches Tasting Table Today". New York Magazine. Retrieved 6 October 2008. 
^ Jason Del Rey (September 12, 2001). "Entrepreneurs in the News". Inc. 
^ Comcast Sets Deal to Buy Daily Candy
^ [2]
^ Wrap Staff (January 28, 2010). "Ipsos Buys Online Research Firm OTX". The Wrap. 
^ "Breaking News". USA Today. September 23, 2011. 
^ Warner, Charles (March 23, 2011). "Bob Pittman Is Just What Radio Needs". Huffington Post. 
^ [3]
^ Brian Costa (March 20, 2012). "Meet the Mets (Minority Owners): Bob Pittman, Kenneth Lerer". Wall Street Journal. 
^ "AOL's Bob Pittman to Receive Ripple of Hope Award; Mrs. Robert Kennedy to Present Award at New York Gala." U.S. Newswire. US Newswire. 2000. Retrieved September 22, 2009 from HighBeam Research: http://www.highbeam.com/doc/1P2-18885525.html








v
t
e


iHeartMedia



Corporate officers



Bob Pittman (Chairman/CEO)





Board of directors



Lowry Mays
Irving Azoff
B. J. "Red" McCombs
J. C. Watts
John H. Williams





Radio stations



List of radio stations owned by iHeartMedia





Radio networks



Fox Sports Radio
Premiere Networks
Premium Choice
Total Traffic and Weather Network





Miscellaneous



Clear Channel Outdoor
Clear Channel UK
iHeartRadio
List of programming syndicated by iHeartMedia
Mediabase
Radio Computing Services










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Robert_Pittman_(media_executive)&oldid=780799508"					
Categories: 1953 birthsLiving peopleAmerican businesspeopleAmerican business executivesAmerican television company foundersAmerican MethodistsAmerican philanthropistsPeople from Brookhaven, MississippiBusinesspeople from Jackson, MississippiAmerican corporate directorsAOL peopleMTV executivesIHeartMedia, Inc.Hidden categories: Articles with hCards 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 17 May 2017, at 07:48.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 






Robert Pittman Net Worth | Celebrity Net Worth           Celebrity Net Worth  Search Random  Robert Pittman Net WorthHow much is Robert Pittman Worth? in Richest Businessmen › CEOsShare on FacebookShare on TwitterRandom CelebrityRobert Pittman net worth:$100 Million Robert Pittman net worth:  Robert "Bob" Pittman is an American businessman who has a net worth of $100 million dollars.  Robert Pittman was born in Jackson, Mississippi, and began working in radio broadcasting while he was still in his early teens.  By the time he was in his early 20s, he was serving as an announcer for WNBC radio in New York.  He founded MTV, and went on to oversee its early years.  He also revamped Nickelodeon for a slightly older audience, and launched VH1 and Nick at Nite.  From there, he went on to found Quantum Media, which he later sold to Time Warner.  He was subsequently made President and CEO of Time Warner Enterprises.  He also became CEO of Six Flags Theme Parks.  He left Time Warner to become the CEO of Century 21 Real Estate, and then returned to media work, when he became the President of AOL Networks, and then America Online, Inc.  He then co-founded a private investment firm called, Pilot Group, LLC.  In 2010, he began working for Clear Channel, and is now the Chairman and CEO of Clear Channel Media Holdings and Executive Chairman of Clear Channel Outdoor Holdings. Robert PittmanBusinesspersonDate of BirthDec 28, 1953 (63 years old)NationalityUnited States of AmericaMore CEOs Martin Shkreli Net Worth  Brian Sheth Net Worth  Don Blankenship Net Worth  Peter Szulczewski Net Worth  Apoorva Mehta Net Worth  Dana White Net Worth  Mark Hurd Net Worth  Mark Zuckerberg Net Worth  Jimmy Iovine Net Worth  Steve Jobs Net Worth  Share on FacebookAll net worths are calculated by applying a proprietary algorithm. The results are then fact checked and confirmed by a team of editors. We scan all publicly available data and resources and work diligently to ensure that our numbers are the most accurate and up to date net worth data you will find anywhere on the internet.Did we make a mistake?Submit a correction suggestion and help us fix it! Submit a CorrectionDiscussion  Must Read Articles Apple's Long Forgotten Third Co-Founder (Who Missed Out On $80 Billion) Says He Has No Regrets  This Is How Yale University Came To Receive A Class Gift Of $110 Million  Donald Trump Could Have Bought The Cowboys In 1984 For $50 Million. He DEFINITELY Should Have Taken That Deal  PSG Reportedly Willing To Pay World Record Transfer Fee To Acquire Neymar  Shaq Is Planning To Own 100 Krispy Kreme Stores  Billionaire's Ex-Girlfriend Seeking $240 Million              Data Dumps  |  Freebase API (Deprecated)
       |  Google Developers
    
    
      
        Freebase API (Deprecated)
      
    
    
    All Products
  
  Sign in

  
  Send feedback
  





            Hey there! Are you maybe looking for Firebase instead?

            







    Data Dumps
  


The Freebase API will be completely shut-down on Aug 31 2016. This page provides access to the last available data dump. Read more.
Data Dumps are a downloadable version of the data in Freebase. They constitute a snapshot of the data stored in Freebase and the Schema that structures it, and are provided under the same CC-BY license. The Freebase/Wikidata mappings are provided under the CC0 license.

Freebase Triples
Freebase Deleted Triples
Freebase/Wikidata Mappings
License
Citing

Freebase Triples


This dataset contains every fact currently in Freebase.

Total triples: 1.9 billion
Updated: Weekly
Data Format: N-Triples RDF
License: CC-BY

22 GB gzip250 GB uncompressed

Download



The RDF data is serialized using the N-Triples format, encoded as UTF-8 text and compressed with Gzip.


RDF
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.date> "2001-02"^^<http://www.w3.org/2001/XMLSchema#gYearMonth>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.source> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11x1gf2m6>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/type.object.type> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.rate> 4.5 .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://www.w3.org/1999/02/22-rdf-syntax-ns#type> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage>  .


If you're writing your own code to parse the RDF dumps its often more efficient to read directly from GZip file rather than extracting the data first and then processing the uncompressed data.
<subject>  <predicate>  <object> .
Note: In Freebase, objects have MIDs that look like /m/012rkqx. In RDF those MIDs become m.012rkqx. Likewise, Freebase schema like /common/topic are written as common.topic.
The subject is the ID of a Freebase object. It can be a Freebase MID (ex. m.012rkqx) for topics and CVTs or a human-readable ID (ex. common.topic) for schema.
The predicate is always a human-readable ID for a Freebase property or a property from a standard RDF vocabulary like RDFS. Freebase foreign key namespaces are also used as predicates to make it easier to look up keys by namespace.
The object field may contain a Freebase MID for an object or a human-readable ID for schema from Freebase or other RDF vocabularies. It may also include literal values like strings, booleans and numeric values.
Topic descriptions often contain newlines. In order to make each triple fit on one line, we have escaped newlines with "\n".
Freebase Deleted Triples
We also provide a dump of triples that have been deleted from Freebase over time. This is a one-time dump through March 2013. In the future, we might consider providing periodic updates of recently deleted triples, but at the moment we have no specific timeframe for doing so, and are only providing this one-time dump. 

The dump is distributed as a .tar.gz file (2.1Gb compressed, 7.7Gb uncompressed). It contains 63,036,271 deleted triples in 20 files (there is no particular meaning to the individual files, it is just easier to manipulate several smaller files than one huge file).


Thanks to Chun How Tan and John Giannandrea for making this data release possible.




Total triples: 63 million
Updated: June 9, 2013
Data Format: CSV
License: CC-BY

2 GB gzip8 GB uncompressed

Download



The data format is essentially CSV with one important caveat. The object field may contain any characters, including commas (as well as any other reasonable delimiters you could think of). However, all the other fields are guaranteed not to contain commas, so the data can still be parsed unambiguously.

The columns in the dataset are defined as:

creation_timestamp (Unix epoch time in milliseconds)
creator
deletion_timestamp (Unix epoch time in milliseconds)
deletor
subject (MID)
predicate (MID)
object (MID/Literal)
language_code



CSV
1352854086000,/user/mwcl_wikipedia_en,1352855856000,/user/mwcl_wikipedia_en,/m/03r90,/type/object/key,/wikipedia/en/$B816,en
1355171076000,/user/mwcl_musicbrainz,1364258198000,/user/turtlewax_bot,/m/0nncp9z,/music/recording/artist,/m/01vbfm4,en
1176630380000,/user/mwcl_images,1335928144000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/029w57m,/common/image/size,/m/0kly56,en
1292854917000,/user/mwcl_musicbrainz,1364823418001,/user/mbz_pipeline_merge_bot,/m/0fv1vl8,/type/object/type,/common/topic,en
1205530905000,/user/mwcl_images,1336022041000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/01x5scz,/common/licensed_object/license,/m/02x6b,en
1302391361000,/user/content_administrator,1336190973000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/0gkb45y,/type/object/type,/type/content,en
1176728962002,/user/mwcl_images,1335954186000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/08430h,/common/topic/image,/m/02cs147,en
1172002568007,/user/mwcl_chefmoz,1283588560000,/user/delete_bot,/m/01z4c1z,/type/object/name,La Casa Rosa Mexican Restaurant,en


Freebase/Wikidata Mappings


The data has been created based on the Wikidata-Dump of October 28, 2013, and contains only those links that have at least two common Wikipedia-Links and not a single disagreeing Wikipedia-Link. Furthermore, the lines are sorted by the number of common Wikipedia-Links (although in Turtle this does not really matter).

Total triples: 2.1M
Updated: October 28, 2013
Data Format: N-Triples RDF
License: CC0

21.2 MB gzip242.9 MB uncompressed

Download



The RDF data is serialized using the N-Triples format, encoded as UTF-8 text and compressed with Gzip.


RDF
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0695j>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q6718> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.05nrg>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs7>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q538> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0jgd>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q414> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0d_23>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q2537> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.04g7d>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q315> .


License
Freebase Data Dumps are provided free of charge for any purpose with regular updates by Google. They are distributed, like Freebase itself, under the Creative Commons Attribution (aka CC-BY) and use is subject to the Terms of Service.
The Freebase/Wikidata ID mappings are provided under CC0 and can be used without restrictions.
Citing
If you'd like to cite these data dumps in a publication, you may use:

Google, Freebase Data Dumps, https://developers.google.com/freebase/data, <month> <day>, <year>

Or as BibTeX:


BibTex

@misc{freebase:datadumps,
  title = "Freebase Data Dumps"
  author = "Google",
  howpublished = "\url{https://developers.google.com/freebase/data}",
  edition = "<month> <day>, <year>",
  year = "<year>"
}




Except as otherwise noted, the content of this page is licensed under the Creative Commons Attribution 3.0 License, and code samples are licensed under the Apache 2.0 License. For details, see our Site Policies. Java is a registered trademark of Oracle and/or its affiliates.

      
      Last updated February 10, 2017.
    




Send feedback about...
          
          This page
        
            
            Documentation feedback
          
        Freebase API (Deprecated)
        
            
            Product feedback
          
        
        Cancel
      
